Ich muss leider feststellen, dass das einzige, was wirklich zur DE Leitkultur gehört, die Peinlichkeit Stakkato von jedem Innenminister ist. Da macht der Tommy auch brav mit. Und ich schreibe seit 2015 wie immer wenn ich über Tommy schreibe den Hashtag #immernochinamt Es ist ein Wunder, wie er so viele Pannen überstanden hat und den Absurd weiter und höher getrieben hat. 
Yeah just made the trip this weekend. Not a bad drive at all. 
Hey girl you look great and I really appreciate your detailed Google drive stuff. I'm switching from a brosplit to SC and I'm just wondering if you include the warms as they're written. I feel like the warm ups themselves could be time consuming and a work out on their own! Also about how long were you at the gym and how many days a week did you do SC? 
The next hulk most likely
It's the one that's stuck with me the most. Still resonates every time I find myself behind a logging truck. 
Not really, just Spartan armor isn't allowed to be made from mundane plastic, because that's hard to justify on the juicy military contracts.  Also, don't get the suit wet.
On Monday, the first time analysed all is a Photo capture from the first time analysed all is a Photo capture from the first time analysed all is a Photo capture from the first time analysed all is a Photo capture from the first time analysed all is a Photo capture from the first time analysed all is a Photo capture from the first time analysed all is a Photo capture from the first time analysed all is a Photo capture from the first time analysed all is a Photo capture from the first time analysed all is a
But it wasn't TRUE communism.   /s
Ok, thanks. I'm happy to get rid of the motherboard. You can throw it away. I just can't bring myself to do so. I love PC parts too much to thow them away. Haha
Join a club and seek to be in charge some day. 
* CZ P07  * 15rd  * polymer frame  * 3.75" barrel  * 7.2"x5.3"x1.46"  * 27.7oz unloaded * G19  * 15rd  * polymer frame  * **4.01" bbl**  * 7.28"x**4.99"**x**1.18"**  * **23.65oz** unloaded  Get the Glock.  Join GSSF, and get the Glock.  
Not available in USA?
After seeing [this,](https://my.mixtape.moe/roodhp.mp4) I've come to the conclusion that CR7 is the best player of all time. No doubts. Takes godlike skill to pull that off.
we go through whip too fast and the last drips go in our trashes.   However we love to stick our hands in mocha every night and joke about doing a face mask. 
Super fun to watch. Anybody here remember the "Pirates of the Caribbean" video game from 2003? (It was originally going to be Sea Dogs 2, made by Akella.) The gameplay here takes me back to ship vs. ship combat in that game, though this is much better.
Nope, I sent her tiny descriptions of the characters and she came up with everything herself. I would love to have actual playing card versions of them.
Did he actually say that??? Lmfao. Not great audio at the bar brother 
i'd cry *for* him
Thought so too. Nothing happening.
I really hope MK Ultra is not real. What the fuck can we do if mind control is in play? 
Aftercare is hard in a Long Distance Sub/Dom relationship.
[Devi Navi!](http://nhentai.net/g/107484)
Yeah, fair enough. But maybe you could create a MeetUp group for board games or hiking or something, or even reach out to the one group and ask if they'd be open to doing more under 21 events?  I mean, rush can be a little overwhelming for sure. I rushed a social sorority and HATED it. Being in that type of situation was not only totally not fun for me but being a part of the sorority killed my self-esteem. By contrast, the people I met in the honors fraternity were really nice and it was a lot less difficult to get along with them. It was weird to meet everyone during rush for that, but a lot of rush is just about starting dialogues. It would be a good way for you to meet people, to work on conversation skills, and to possibly get involved in an organization moving forward. If you know someone who's there, that may even make it easier.
It's in a gym bag somewhere amoungst some rifle ammo and the latest issue of Guns, Guns, Guns.
Because the OP doesn't know how Liquipedia works
No... what is that haha?
I am very willing to be that if the Republicans believe they will lose majority, and that Trump impeachment has weight, they will impeach him and Pence before the 2018 elections to prevent a democrat from taking over the Presidency.  Alternatively, they will impeach trump and try to keep Pence clean.  Then Pence becomes President and selects a new VP.  Then when the Democrats get the majority they will likely continue investigations into Pence, and if they impeach him they will be left with the clean GOP VP taking over.
When the hell would Jonathan admit the stone mask is better than ripple? At least uncle Dio is right for once :D  And I'm so exicted what they will do with Telence DARBY
Don't feel bad for him. Paul Ryan is no statesman, but a man without vision, intellect, or even a *conscience* - he's an empty suit meant to sit in that chair just long enough to strip healthcare from the poor.
Somehow that timeout was really hype, even though it wasn't a last second kinda match. So historic tbh
That is not supposed to happen.
That is a 100% abuser red flag, you should be extremely worried about her.
I met someone that I fee a nice connection to this week, and we have already tripped on some lsd together. Damn she is an amazing woman, but she is moving away, god damnit 
Let's piss off China right before potential military actions in N. Korea...what the fuck is wrong with this administration?
I know my mechanic. He is far from a HS dropout, and he is ASE certified.   I don't know anything about a guy who posts an ad on CL. He may be experienced, he may be a great guy. But I don't want some guy from a random ad inside my house. It has nothing to do with being scared. It's common sense.
I see your point about transfer. Having said that, if you like Colgate over Lehigh, go now. Don't think of transfer. Both are good schools. To get into medical school, you need a high undergrad GPA, clinical/research experience, and MCAT. In general, students from small, liberal arts schools tend to do well when it comes to graduate school admissions, including medical schools. So that's a plus for Colgate. 
This is how a presidential assassin is born. I picture your living room wall three months from now covered in newspaper clippings connected with red string all leading back to a print out of this picture. 
The hilarious irony being we might finally get a top 2 home final and we'll have to play you.  
Done. You can't flair from the mobile app :/
lol that's Smackdown bro. Tonight is raw
Intro:  &gt; From gun rights to terrorism to same-sex marriage, many leading advocates on the right who grew frustrated with their country’s leftward tilt under President Barack Obama have forged ties with well-connected Russians and come to see that country’s authoritarian leader, Vladimir Putin, as a potential ally. &gt;  &gt; The attitude adjustment among many conservative activists helps explain one of most curious aspects of the 2016 presidential race: a softening among many conservatives of their historically hard-line views of Russia. To the alarm of some in the GOP’s national security establishment, support in the party base for then-candidate Donald Trump did not wane even after he rejected the tough tone of 2012 nominee Mitt Romney, who called Russia America’s No. 1 foe, and repeatedly praised Putin.
Such a shame. Was one of my favouritr fixtures for years. They killed it by making it completely meaningless to Origin selection, ensuring basically no matter how well someone plays in it, unless they're selected ahead of the match, their performance means nothing.
I appreciate the article but that site on mobile gave my phone ad cancer
But-but-but that's not the Soviet Flag!!
Warriors in 6  Spurs in 5  Cavs in 5  Wizards in 7
Perhaps i wasnt clear, what that dude was really fucked up. There are no words that you could say, imo, that should end with you getting your face kicked in. I sincerely doubt this dude will spend much if any time in prison unless he has a history of being a lunatic.  I'd be curious to hear how his girlfriend reacted to this. Pretty shocking behavior honestly, or maybe thats why she called him instead of the police.
BAZINGA ! I DONT CARE 
Yes.  The one time I did a video, for Prussian Blue in the 2014 tournament, I didn't use audio, and I felt the result was lacking.  Any volunteers?  Otherwise, I can cobble some videos together, and they'll have audio.  I was hoping to be able to automate the tournament much more with the SpaceChem recreation in a website I've been fiddling with, here:  http://spacechem.batcave.net .  But it's hard to find time to work on such projects.  I'll try to do more work on it, but I doubt I'll have it ready for anything useful.  Soon, I should refresh my memory on how to use SpagChem's tool.
I'm so happy this is a thing.
Draft hunting parties for large predators. It's worth the time investment to make sure that nobody gets hurt by bringing overwhelming force to kill them before they get into melee range or cause crossfires. Prioritize stronger single-shot weapons over weaker automatics. Early on, weak shots from a pistol or shortbow have a high chance to enrage animals, but lethal shots from pila or greatbows means most animals don't have a chance.  Assault rifles are about as low-tier as I'll go for automatic weapons, and even then I prefer survival rifles at that level. For minor amounts of crossfire micromanagement doable at 2x speed, simply draft-then-un each time a colonist scores a kill. That'll prevent them from wandering up into the line of fire to haul, and instead pick a new target. 
UNC finally got a makerspace? State been reppin several for years my g ;)
We're sorry, but your post is in violation of our rules. You must include a buyout in the post **body** of every thread posted [**exactly as specified in this thread**](http://www.reddit.com/r/GlobalOffensiveTrade/comments/2tdpzs/psa_there_is_now_a_buyout_feature_to/), unless there has been an exception made by the moderators for any particular reason. Please also take this time to [examine our rules](http://www.reddit.com/r/GlobalOffensiveTrade/wiki/rules) for future reference.  If you intend to contact us about this action (or any other ones), please ensure that you have read this comment in its entirety (making sure to read through any relevant links) and make sure you grasp a full understanding of what it means *before* contacting us.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/GlobalOffensiveTrade) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Like who are they trying to fool?
It's a soft metallic sound, can only really hear it if it's close to your ear. 
I'm sorry, can someone explain? Do you mean goat shepherds?
I think that Newegg did not delete their Bitcoin explanation page, like Dell and Expedia (both still have such a page but the option disappeared from their payment form).  NewEgg does not accept Bitcoin anymore according to [this](https://www.newegg.com/bitcoin) and several testimonies that Google finds.
God damn dude. That body and cock are amazing. 
Australians would [sneak into your HQ](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Peaceful_penetration), flash a machete at you and and say "THAT'S is a knife".
Wow. I would be absolutely crazy upset. :( I can't even imagine how hard it would be to save up 50 blue coupons.
I'm just hoping I get down a little before I get pregnant again. Then I'd never get it off lol. 
You know females offer more than sex right lmfao
Oh god that one gets to me too. Faramir just wanted so bad to live up to his brother in his father's eyes. He was willing to ride into certain death to make is father proud. "If I should not return, think better of me father", with tears in his eyes. 
Bears
I try my absolute hardest to avoid the conspiracies but yeah...idk what to say.  Sometimes I just think that they really are that retarded though
Sue. Songs have been written on why it's a wrong name.
Looks like OP can't get no satisfaction.
I was so disappointed when I found out it's the House of Horrors and not The House of Whores...
Of course. Just on repeat. 
https://m.imgur.com/hJOr4qZ?r
I know, I meant if he competed sorry 
I'm glad you now know how to use ear buds correctly (lol), but if you'll ever want to listen to some music while shaking your head (like... jogging or sth) I'd recommend ear buds that are designed to hang ON your ears. Any normal ear bud will fall out in such a situation. If you're wearing a coat outside, then the cable of the ear buds running from your poclet is inconvenient no matter if it's inside or outside, so Bluetooth ear buds are also really cool. (The only downside to them is that you have to charge them from time to time, but that's usually lightning fast.)  Just try IBOX X1
They taught me how to be a gamer. Be a player.
Do you think Tom would like this post if he saw it? 
Which is why they are doing the opposite of what they should be doing.  The moderates are going to vote for them no matter what.  They need to be courting the progressives that actually care about what the party is selling.  Take this most recent election for example...they would have lost zero votes by going with a more progressive platform, but they might have been able to get more progressives to turn out (not that i think this would have helped too much in this case...the votes they needed were the blue dogs in the rust belt that voted for Trump...interestingly, a progressive policy on trade would have won over those voters as well).
Yeah, you're right. Grats to you as well. It still takes quite awhile even with the help of gts.
She's already taken the high road. She doesn't need to do him any more favors. 
You have a small room
"Stare at me like I'm a kangaroo"   Laughed harder than I should have sorry haha, just picturing a kangaroo hopping thru the Yonge eg centre, a group of goths and the roo having a stare off and the roo feeling sad (vs picking a fight)   The growth of big businesses, condos and the expansion of the "northern toronto" locations of popular downtown places will bring they type of folks you don't like there. Don't see them going away. Might need to adapt. 
Cheesy if you ask me, but whatever
MILLAH!
Dont say kebab and post a doner you normie
I'm pretty sure the driver is the guy who tried to help her, he probably didn't pull the handbrake or something
I guess that's what I've always heard, a quick google proved me wrong. That's a definite option. 
You should try shadowverse. I like it a lot better than hearthstone and you get a lot more free stuff.
Beer.
Walang team Kabite kahit may rumors daw yung team ni CHieffy ang magiging team ng Kabite....  Pero napaka excited pa rin ako, sa wakas mayron na ding national sports league sa Pinas. 
~~Dead play if stick is above shoulder, not crossbar. Didn't go in off RNH's stick and since his stick wasn't above the shoulder it's not a dead play.~~  EDIT: I'm wrong. High stick above crossbar would disallow goal, either a direct one or off a player. 
Financial Independence, Retire Early
I can't believe they didn't hit one of those lights overhead!
There is the Korean Drama movie on Netflix called Pandora. Holy shit, there is the scene in which the main character is locked in the fuel cell room (because he has to blow the roof up because plot, and there isn't time to set up remote detonation) and he breaks down about how he doesn't want to die and it's just so sad. If you can you should watch it.
Ive heard a lot of what used to be said about Cobb being a racist was overblown or totally false.
Just a note, an admin is not the same as a moderator. I'm a moderator for this subreddit, but I am not a Reddit administrator.
Why do people constantly credit him when literally hundreds of people do the Undertaker thing? Are all his posts that or something?
the line of the night was about the five minute entrance, they do listen to the universe after all!!
I wish we had something like that. All we got from our parents was cheap advice and schizophrenic tendencies. Ouch.
So a while back there was a similar thread that kicked me into a two day anxiety attack.  Honestly, I'm a successful 35 year old woman with her own house, financially stable, great job, amazing friends and has HSV2.  I've had long-term three partners - and one intimate relationship outside of those.  I was extremely safe in all but my last long term (8+ years) relationship where I contracted it shortly after meeting him.  Thing was - he had no idea he was a carrier - he'd never seen any symptoms (this honestly is a thing - most people don't actually know they're carrying and not as diligent as those in this sub).  But at that point in time - we were perfect for one another, I saw myself with him for the rest of my life and HSV2 was an annoying skin rash I'd just have to deal with as there was no going back.  That relationship ended a year and a half ago - and threads like these make my anxiety hit a 10/10 as I start to contemplate dating again it's very clear that the annoying skin rash that I contracted - that I know how to control (through meds, the right combo of vitamins, a healthy diet, exercise and keeping stress down) is apparently going to be a huge deal to someone else. Yeah, not something that will ever be cured, understood all other tests I've had done have been negative.  I will never hide it from someone, I will always disclose well before any form of intimacy - but reading these threads make me think that I'll be alone with my cat pretty much the rest of my life due to what I consider to be an annoying skin rash. Honestly - I'm not a terrible person - I've not slept around, been unfaithful, lied or hidden anything from anyone.  I'm a wonderful person and I hope that one day someone will see past this.  I'll not be checking this sub frequently as honestly I feel like the anxiety and shame I feel after reading things like this isn't worth it.
[Original post](https://www.reddit.com/r/LigaMX/comments/68irgr/mineros_de_zacatecas_24_lobos_buap_26_on/) by /u/RougeMammoth in /r/LigaMX  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#match "Zacatecas")
Who the fuck searches all time? I mean at most you can search it once 
Yeah, a bit.   Anyways, most stuff from 20 years ago or so (mid-90s) is going to look dated. The cut and fit of clothing from that era is very out of fashion right now (oversized shirts and pants, loud prints, baggy jeans, unvented suits with long jackets). So you'll be hard pressed to find any clothes from that era that look good now. If you're into finding vintage stuff, go back to the 60s-70s. You can find stuff in thrift and consignment stores and on eBay if you know what you're looking for. In terms of brands, any of the classic american brands that are still around are going to be a good choice, Brooks Brothers, Ralph Lauren, J. Press.
&gt; Hickory Borer  that seems most fitting from what they described to me, thanks a lot!
Black eyebrows and blonde hair?! Bold move. Sorry not as bold as that male jawline of yours.
the original Dragbody's MEGA PACK. 5.5GB of armors, clothes, facecamos and more! enjoy it man! and don't forget to share this with everybody.  http://www.mediafire.com/file/pxcepj93chqyw1j/Drags+Armor+1-33.zip   *this contains the packs 1 to 33
Yeah if you slip up once you can go from 1st to last in an instant. Although I got a Star when in 3rd place? It seems a little unbalanced to me. I still have so much fun though 
Seems a bit strange to use the flag of the East India Company to represent India in this era.  [This one](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/File:British_Raj_Red_Ensign.svg) would have been more appropriate.
Fifth... you said fourthcoming
I mirror someone else's comment that I really hate the idea that this is where Sigma ends up infected with some sort of virus.  That just...  Ruins the scene.   Because here we see Sigma, he's kind of walking in to this with a bit of  grin on his face.  But from what he's said, he might be overconfident but he realizes what he's going to do is going to be for a greater purpose.  That purpose being...  Stop the red maverick that's killing everything for fun.  The fight begins and it's pretty clear that Sigma isn't thinking much of Zero.  The light surprise when Zero rushes at him, I take that to be more of a "this guy's really just going straight at me?" response.  For a short bit the fight seems to be mostly Sigma just toying with Zero for a bit, until he decides to try ending the fight.  Only to be surprised that Zero isn't even fazed by the impacts.  Which puts Sigma on the defensive, so much so that he decides to bring his saber out and try to put an end to it quickly.  Sigma does get his wish...  Only it turns out to be a monkey's paw because he had to pay an arm for it.  In the end, the only reason Sigma won was because Zero ended up stalled for that unknown reason and was wide open as a result.  Sigma knows that this victory was an absolutely lucky break, and the fight itself left him so broken that he couldn't even be what was his usual self.  ...'Course.  Throw the virus in and this scene stops being about how Sigma might've wanted to take deeper looks into X and Zero to see what Reploids overall could be, with the ultimate result of this viral infection circa X5 totally not essentially being the same thing as the effects of DG Cells from G Gundam.
Yeah man, it's cool if you want to have two brakes, but it's a non-issue law-wise. Plus if you're riding fixed, that can be considered a brake.
20 min
Would you take both for the Grey Spiralis, FG FSL, and Pink Spyder?
what? Did you read the books?
Oh God, she looks like a tree-hugging hippie in the thumbnail. 😂   Bet she's in an all-organic, gluten-free diet.
[[Surrak, the Hunt Caller]] or [[Surrak Dragonclaw]] are the only appropriate answers.  The dude straight up punches bears, enough said.
At least you're not sitting next to someone trying to get a Chris Benoit chant started (like me)
I don't think that's what paradox means. 
Ya know, I actually like the match graphics for this PPV.   The still graphic of the Superstar with their opponent's video in the background, it's interesting because it's like they are, in a sense, in the back of their mind. 
Yes please &lt;3
You only get loyalty cars the first time you start up the game, so if you've already played Horizon 3, you're not going to get it.
Multiple brain surgeries 
I'll pass for now.. Sorry.
Wonder what match starts off the show 
Only if you have copy printed on hemp paper
M: okay. Fair enough
Volkswagen is the weakest legendary weapon in the game. If it was offensive [Tyrfing](http://feheroes.gamepedia.com/Tyrfing), it would be infinitely better.  I'm considering to 5 star him just for Arena, but I got a +Atk/-Def Chrom sitting at 4 stars who just casually has 5 more Atk. Also, I'm very [saturated](https://docs.google.com/spreadsheets/d/10bcYDSwA2iRS82ktwTdwkCuGTHMVIOoFeGVmZwdjN5g/edit?usp=sharing) on swords, not sure if I can afford the feathers on yet another red hero.
&gt;Sure you could use an x86 x64 proc and active cooling and a laptop mobo and hook up some webcams and dump that to an SSD but are you going to stick that on your dash? Where's it going to fit?  If only there was some area built in cars that had mass amounts of storage this setup could be mounted in.  *Technology* Isn't the issue here, it's the consumer and what they can afford.  Thanks for attempting to dismiss what I say as living in Kentucky, cocksucker.
The best mattifier I've tried is the tea tree oil mattifying lotion by The Body Shop. This stuff keeps me matte all day but never dry. It's helped my acne a bit, as well.
If you buy a game and don't like it, and only played a few hours you can return it.
Holy shit, that's spot on.
N
how many keys do you want for the black spiralis?
&gt; Because if you add a girl to a group of guys it changes the dynamics  This is 200% true in tabletop gaming in particular. I'm a guy, and every group I've DMed or played in without a woman in the group just devolved into dick measuring, misogynistic jokes, and having sex with every NPC. It's weird and gross and made me really give a few friends a second look.
Well written. 
The navy blue Estilio 5.0 looks more purple than navy blue. I have one.
Was this the game that Langerak punched Lewi in the face?
It's not real bro
Thanks :)
Not in the mood for pasta. Some asshole decided to smash a whole jar of pasta sauce in the bathroom where I work, oddly they left the pasta still in the box next to it. 
No problem!
Google him in his Lotus years.
The Preshow Panel: Can Roman Reigns stop Braun Strowman?  Me: Ehh, yes? He already did it at Fast Lane-
What's going on with Baltimore's pass rushers? They completely gave up a few seconds into the play. 
Thank you. I think I needed to have this validated.
Correct!
I listen mostly to K-Pop, so it's always a tough crowd lol.
sonyD doesn't realize hes gonna have to take care of mitch, he is gonna regret signing that lease sooner than he thinks
Thanks.  Anything relevant to story building happen or no?
Awesome! Great article thanks.
There really is, especially in the Illinois area! Finding someone whose sweet and does a great job is hard (all of our vendors were as budget as we could find and some were so RUDE on the day of). Dhani was the sweetest person ever and went ABOVE and beyond. She brought us sparklers at no charge, did a 8 hour engagement shoot, brought us a second shooter at no charge.. it goes on and on so I always mention her when I can :)  Good luck! I'm sure your day will be amazing!
Being from New Orleans and thinking you're Cajun... meh you know das Creole country...
Wo: **"Wo've course. I would love to look at how the food was prepped and try to woproduce it."**
A nice townhouse with all the finishes or a subpar semi-detached house (ie. lacking hardwood floors, granite countertops, etc)
Nope. I've never read a word in my life.  And I don't need luck, I have the Earth on my side. The bogus climate scientists who falsely attribute climate change to man-made factors are the ones who need to hope. They need to "hope" that the climate trends that are currently disproving their crackpot climate theories will eventually convince the growing number of well-informed skeptics that they're right. The numbers aren't on their side, unfortunately for them.  But I'll keep standing back and pointing at them and laughing these people. These are the same folks who believe that Bill Nye is a scientist.
jk this is my oc aayayyyyy limousine 
C
I was referring to "Abolishing the 1st Amendment."
How did he know?
https://medium.com/@Hipstercrite/dear-people-who-live-in-fancy-tiny-houses-21fdc639ce55
psn papadominos
Hopefully Roman continues to get the nuclear heel heat.
I can agree. I have the newer models, AND love them. However, I use them for movies and not gaming.
I noticed the same problem here, altough I'm on the oposite spectrum, playing on a intel core m 5y71 machine.  I got 70-80 % cpu usage while running hearthstone + hearthstone deck tracker. I managed to lower it to about 40-50% by making the blizzard app to close itself when the game starts. I've also disabled streaming since I don't use it.
Well best possible would be high elf for dps, dunmer is more fire dmg
I know, I'm so sorry T_T.
It's actually just because everything is so far apart
I mean make a game that people will play often on their phones  There's plenty of games that people come back to on mobile
S I N G I N G  T E D D Y  B O I Z
Hey if you're in LA I would love to chat!
I'm glad he suffered to be honest he didn't suffer long enough
Take whichever pays more or gives you whatever youre looking for. The point difference between a part time and full time job for a year is minuscule. 
That's good, but your brain needs a LOT of thiamin in early recovery. I suggest getting a Vitamin B complex with thiamin. It'll help with the fog, trust me
r/assholedesign
Renee is so hot.
Hopdoggo is the best name ever
You probably will be happy if you go either way, I would suggest going with the Rift for the free content, lower price (even with a third sensor), integrated audio is fantastic and the product is really nice and polished.
No bias whatsoever 
My favorite low key joke is on the underground trip to pripyat, Zulu says "don't worry, real men often take the back entrance". Then again in SHoC, where max assigns golya to guard the rear, and a random soldier says "well sure, no ones ever watching the rear except golya" Good times stalker.
Gotta stop the devil from entering your body somehow 
What are you using to apply? I use a damp sponge to sheer it out.
I didn't hear this, kind of surprising given those giant doors.  What are people saying?
Superman, Batman, Wonder Woman, Aquaman, Flash and Cyborg is six heroes not five.  Geoff John's just probably couldn't think of a clip for Green Lantern shot to hamdistedly force into BVS and that's why we haven't seen him yet
OLD GUY JIU JITSU
Mkay, approofed
The original idea of the vote system was to downvote a post that didn't add to the discussion. It had nothing to do with agreeing or disagreeing.  I am a big fan of the arrows. Unfortunately Reddit did not realise that lower intelligence will always rear it's ugly head on some forums. This is why I have two accounts. Many redditors don't bother to upvote or downvote because it's frowned upon. I still like to upvote a post that engages me. Most genuine posters here do the same.
ddosing is  a actual crime you fucking retard, google it, next thing yopu wanmna tell me that hacking someone is not a crime too
Honestly if I were you I would keep her at arms length (nothing more than Snapchat) until I was 18  I hope your birthday isn't too far away  In all seriousness if you're not interested just say you're not interested, then just tell her you're 17 and it's not legal or some shit
I don't get it
What episode (and time)?
If I had to put RB# on them Fournette RB10, McCaffrey RB12, Cook RB20, Mixon RB26  Fournette could very well turn in a season we saw from Gurley year 1 and end up top 5, with ~1200+ yards 10TDs.  McCaffrey has questions regarding goal-line where we can assume JStew will take these so a ceiling of 200 carries, 80 receptions 8TDs on offense 4 receiving, 4 rushing (maybe some additional returning).   Cook also has some depth questions, will he take goal-line carries or Murray. I also think he'll be on the field less than either Fournette or McCaffrey.   Part of the issue for Mixon isn't just the depth around him at RB but the Bengals lost their two best linemen, so I'd assume holes won't open up as easily.
I think they need to not penalize the teammate that stayed and give the winners their points. Only if they quit out before a certain time though. Then after a minute passes and the quitting teammate doesn't join back in, stop the game. 
the problem is that I mean with that that they are cosmetic updates. With either being hats for tf2, skins for csgo or I don't know what for dota 2.  I wouldn't complain if they would do actual content updates again.
Honestly I feel like I may have wrote some of the descriptions wrong but I can't tell
40:1 
&gt;&gt;two kings and one queen (totaling nearly 100 years of reign) had their actual birthdays in late May and June.  What? The current one is born in April and the last one was in December. 
in an alternate universe faze lost that HP and this thread would only change by 1 word
"do spongebob memes have potential"...........😒
I purchased thru them for delivery to the US.  Took about 3 weeks for delivery and box got a little mangled, but they were packed well and were as expected when they arrived.  
Ok bud thanks for your opinion.
https://youtu.be/2msWphlbnBc  The best video I've seen of how to make small rocks.  Tips:   don't use to much baking soda.  Use one of those tea light candles to the spoon  Once the white bubbling stops just take the heat away immediately.  Give it time to dry 
Downtown there are quite a few, also by PNC park and occasionally at the waterfront as well 
You watch your language kid. I don't die to it, never said so.  Conqueror is just so boring to play against. If the community doesn't "bitch" about it, it'll never get reworked.
Legit, I'm just here to see what they do with Bray and Randy.
Np, didn't want to leave you hanging.  That's a big matzo ball hanging out there...
You might have an alien fetish. Imo 
*Dual*. It's dual grind, lol. Duel is when two guys have a swordfight. Dual means two.
$45?
The dicc
Apagando Las Useless  Jk, that looks really good! 
I kinda agree with you there. I guess i expected so much after the success of Super Troopers.  Beerfest wasn't too bad.
I know. I want my internet to not hurt peoples feelings too. 
seriously 
Another problem I've had and this is a bit off subject is that anime verses have MUCH less scrutiny than dragonball or comic feats. People just seem to unanimously accept that madoka is multiversal and this is especially noted with anime because it isn't main stream.
Because Big Ben on the road sucks.
It might not be a bad idea to give some people no safety net, or instill fear into making change.  It's very common that nobody improves their health w/o some form of health scare that basically forces them to.   I think Boogie is a good dude and he'd probably understand that actually. He knows he has work to do, and he knows that ultimately he's responsible for his own health.
Just Google migrant crime stories. Foreign stories about them are often censored so Germans cant read them within the country. 
no.
Sure. I've had (non-lucid) dreams where I've solved proofs and one where I actually dreamed in the language I was working in at the time (I was putting in too long of hours during that internship...)
It can, but it's not guaranteed.
you lost the last match and left before the screen could play and you didnt earn enough mmr to rank back up.
Why?  I get that Tyler is a fun guy to watch and whatnot, but he had more than enough chances. Think about all the games he ruined while getting 17 accounts banned.  I know that when someone ints like that in my game I want to see them banned. The rules are clear, and he broke them over and over again. 
Who's the man of the couple ?
&gt; I still don't see why Armada should be held to a different standard than everyone else  because no one should be held to that standard in the first place
Thanks? Lol!
Trans women offer a trans view point, not a woman's view point.  This includes, and I would say is especially susceptible to, confirmation bias and stereotype threat.
Lol "accused of consensual adultery." Yes! It was him . I had no say in the matter. I knew he was married and I consented (but still had no say in the matter). It's not like I have two legs, with which to leave if I regretted the situation. 
It's better to have an elite PG in this league than an elite SF.
Your post has been removed as it didn't follow rule two:  &gt;Blep goes in title  Feel free to resubmit your blepicture with a modified title. Thanks!  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/Blep) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Wannabe is such a perfect thesis statement for the Spice Girls.
You guys would hate Louis CK's show Louie. It's all about taking that awkward feeling and stretching it as far as possible for several seasons..
I don't want a fair price, I want something unfairly low. 
Havent played it until this weekend. I [get it](http://imgur.com/WlBMrpS) now.
This is true, but it also needs to be said that pats consistently keep a few UDFA each season...so there is always opportunity.  I think there was something the seahawks released a few years ago that showed new England consistently has a high number of UDFA on roster each year...and that preseason playing time is one of the highest as well (which is big for players that may not make roster...as they can showcase for other teams to be PS players or even potentially 53 man.
or the ones that tighten!
haha I pictured this as cayenne pepper and now I can't unthink it.
I rode to a shooting match in North Georgia yesterday. It's about an hour on the freeway from my house in Atlanta, then 30 or so minutes riding through moderate twisties to get to the gun club. I hit the twisties at about 9am and there was very little traffic. I just passed a few cars going the other way, nothing in front of me. About 10 minutes into cruising along these awesome roads at a leisurely pace (with my side-cases loaded down with shooting gear and heavy assed ammo), I see a pack of 4 riders coming up in my mirrors. Not hauling ass but going quite a bit faster than me. I make this ride once a month and knew there was a nice long straight stretch two bends ahead. Once I hit it, I pulled to the right and motioned for the pack to pass even though it was double-yellow, which they did. I was tempted to blow off the shooting match and just keep riding. But I knew the roads would still be there waiting for me after the match. It was a damned fine Saturday.
rip just did this trade http://prnt.sc/f2pviq
I try to complement.
It took 40 to make it. Pm me I could send you the step by step pictures we took
I've also got an inflatable kayak that I've used to paddle down the river then deflate it, pack it onto my bicycle and ride back to my car.
As a lg yes but it's been theorized that he would be better at rg. which is his natural position. Even then he's better than most people on the Seahawks line other than glowinski and Britt, and this would allow them to put pocic at te instead of playing a dlineman or ifiedi
Where there is a Wil, there is a way.
Assuming you met all the terms of the promo (DPP, pre-order, new UDP plan) then you either send in the phone via the label or take it to a corporate store.   It's unclear by your post but it seems you may have started the mail in process which would mean now you just mail the device in and can no longer turn it in at a corporate store. 
lol can anybody here fucking read? He was not a fucking reckless brawler. He still isn't. Deteriorating != a reckless brawler. Don't even know why I bother. 95% of the forum have been watching MMA for &lt;2 years and probably didn't watch a single PRIDE fight when it was even a current org.
I can't take this on a nightly basis. Love exciting baseball but common boys some 5-6 run wins would be ideal
It's a fucking analogy to prove a point
Props to the Miz too, it seems like every star shines brighter next to the Miz.
TL;dr: Prohibitions in Lev 17-26 focus on religions that are present in the vicinity of the Israelites.  The prohibition against homosexuals is incorrect because the focus was for prohibition of male and female ritual prostitution practices of local religions that existed concurrently with the Israelites.  Thanks for doing the leg work to itemize the verses.  We're in agreement about a lot.  Let me clarify because I was pulling up what I remembered from a week long case study I did on these chapters over five years ago.  I think we can both agree on a good portion of the following statement: Lev 17-26 (Holiness Code) is focused heavily on creating laws that draw a line between the Israelites and the religions that worshipped Baal, Asherah, and Molech.  This allows for the invading Israelites to differentiate between themselves and the "Others" that live and exist alongside of them in the Holy Land.  The laws found throughout the Torah codified the Israelites "xenophobia" and allowed for the Israelites to ultimately populate the area without immediately blending/dulling their ancestral cultural practices with the cultural practices of the Others.  To use your point: &gt;Leviticus 20 begins in discussing "any man of Israel..." having some form of intercourse, with ...specifically, those who worship the god Molech.  By the time the OT narrative gets to Judges, we're able to see what happens when the tribes of Israel bred with aliens from outside of their tribe/faith/orthopraxy (see Judges 2:12).  I don't have any idea if there is transcription of what beliefs were held by the Others during the time that the Holiness Code was disseminated throughout the Israelites, so I can only assume that many of these practices that are prohibited by the Law were observed to be ritual and cultural standards of the Others.  We do know that the Torah mentions sacrifices, scarification, idolatry, and **ritual prostitution**.  We know that Shrine/Ritual Prostitution was a practice of the Others: &gt; There were even male shrine prostitutes in the land; the people engaged in all the detestable practices of the nations the Lord had driven out before the Israelites. &gt;1 Kings 14:24, NIV (see also: 2 Kings 23:7)  And we know that the Jews were already practicing foreign ideas by carrying idols throughout the Wilderness: &gt;“Did you bring me sacrifices and offerings forty years in the wilderness, people of Israel?  You have lifted up the shrine of your king, the pedestal of your idols, the star of your god- which you made for yourselves.  Therefore I will send you into exile beyond Damascus,” says the Lord, whose name is God Almighty." &gt;Amos 5:25-27 NIV, (also see: Joshua 24:23)  So far we agree that the Holiness Code is to reiterate what is HEBREW and what is NOT HEBREW in order to protect the cultural and religious practices that were inherited and carried from Abraham to Slavery in Egypt to Leviticus.  Many within the Israelites had already adopted practices from outside faiths by the time the Law was given to the people, so this is a "deep cut" that clarifies everything (on top of the 10-commandments) that helps the Priests to *really* drive home the point.  So this is where you asked for clarification, and I apologize for being loose with my statements from recall: &gt;...It's also not an issue of cross dressing and I'm not sure why that's even a part of the discussion as it's not implied anywhere... but I'm not familiar with anything in that culture that suggests that crossdressing would be as, or more, likely of a phenomenon than homosexual practices.  The crossdressing I referred to in my linked comment was a mistake.  I was referring to male and female ritual prostitution which (and this is something I do not have quote for but recall from two university-level Old Testament classes confirming the same) the tents of prostitutes in the High Places.  Please review my claims about the HC in light of this clarification. My hypothesis is this: "The Holiness Code from Leviticus is designed to tell the Israelites what outside-faith practices are not allowed.  Because of the Bible's repeated emphasis on prohibitions against ritual prostitution, and because of OT's lack of emphasis on prohibition of homosexuality, we can infer that the often cherry-picked verse prohibiting homosexuality is in fact focused on prohibiting the ritual prostitution (both male and female) that was practiced by the faiths of Baal, Asherah, and Molech."  I apologize additionally for shifting to NT focus with my argument, I was trying to make an easy jump between what Paul wrote about how Christians are to view intimacy/intercourse because he did the leg work.  Good discussion.  Digging your POV.
I read the grisha trilogy first and six of crows about a year after. It helps a little bit in understanding a few terminologies thrown around, but I also could have easily not ready the grisha trilogy and been fine. 
We need to organize ourselves, hold peaceful protests, march in the streets. Sure, it may take time to build momentum, but these things start out small. We need get our shit together, and instead of whining about it on the internet, make our presence known in the real world. Alert the media, build ourselves up into a newsworthy moment. Television greatly influences what people know, so we need to make them know who we are and what we stand for. We are literally being stripped of our rights, express that, and the majority of America will back us up. We have been mute for too long, we have been internal for too long. We must develop better PR, get on social networks, we need to not only let people know *that* we exist, but *why* we exist.
Yes. My family took a vacation there, and we got to what we thought was a nice hotel. Some drunk asshole was screaming at a locked door down the hall. We hurried on by to our room. The family liked Edinburgh better.
Using a needle to get all the stick stuff in the corners. lol
Yeah, that's my huge problem with this. And because I like too many ballplayers I'm going to say "Fuck LeMahieu". I need villains.
You are very biased in your way of thinking. Not every gun fight is a "wait til the other guy moves out of position" kind of gun fight, unless you want it to be. More time to enjoy a gunfight in the late circles would be a great thing.
Farcry 3
This is great but WHY is Donnie Wahlberg now our celebrity superfan? 
Boy someone needs a safe space.
You do realize he is putting on a character for his stream right?  It doesn't take a lot IQ to figure that out. I'm not even a fan of his.
PATROL CARBINE
Great tips! One more thing I can think of to add is have your shurikens reloaded before you pop your ult because blade doesn't refill them &amp; you want to be ready once blade is over. 
bonding with friends over food and silly monsters :)
Socialism hard at work.
Unless you're a-clambering for boi pucci then it's a no from me.
if your going that far, might as well grab some seaweed and give her a seaweave.
I't is my first build so I'm totally in the dark. So your help is much appreciated, regarding the case it was suggested from one of the redditers who said it is good for begginer
Reina clunged from Tybolt's neck unlike other times where she had to guide her lovers through the whole act she wanted Tybolt to *own* her. She grabbed one his hands and placed it on her ass while hers opened his doublet and caressed his scared chest.  "I-  will- give- you- an- heir" she mumbled between kisses before breaking away "and he will rule the west under our guidance" she started kissing him again "Those- who have- done us wrong- shall tremble" she mumbled again as she took his doublet off.  (( Want to fade to black or want some smut? lol ))
Swollen with pride. 
Taking a penny from a take-a-penny/leave-a-penny.
Thanks. This is good stuff. But I have to know what the target demographic is for this site. http://imgur.com/a/o19Sr
...you can't possibly believe the chicken is still alive and can feel anything at that point...can you?
I could interpret that quote either way.  Sin no more: move on with your life, don't worry about the cheating you did to get the diploma. Go forth and do God's will, doing good for people.  Sin no more: Don't claim to be a college graduate when you didn't really earn it.  How did you intend the quote?
Why?
"I immediately regret this decision. "
Glad you sorted it out
Possibly, will see how the release goes first. I think that nobody cares but its really nice to see people be interested.
My dad once made spaghetti carbonara with whipped cream...
But look at their faces, I think the camera is fucking up this shot.
To me the series more than anything else is a treatise on trauma, anxiety and existential suffering.  All the characters suffered a massive trauma and demonstrate various [counter productive] coping mechanisms throughout the series and what many fans truly seek through Shinji isn't the resolution of the plot per se but him overcoming his anxiety. That is why for so many the TV ending seems more fitting.  The way Shinji dealt with the loss of his mother and rejection of his father was to disengage with life. He convinced himself that it was better to float through life with no associations because it was less troublesome that way. But like most anxious people he is a hypocrite because at his core he desperately desires intimacy, ergo he is so easily manipulated by his father. Throughout the series we see him struggle against this narrative he had defined for himself, his mantra became 'I mustn't run away' being not the situations themselves, he has a frankly baffling capacity to deal with unbelievable bullshit, but rather the belief that he doesn't deserve intimacy, that for him to desire or strive is wrong or silly.   That's why the metaphor he explores in that final episode means so much. He didn't want a world of nothingness, something that traumatised people so frequently convince themselves they desire and achieve through disassociation or self medication. Instead he wanted intimacy, and he came to appreciate that to get that he had to be willing to reach out, to take a chance to be hurt and to a degree had to see that he was doing it all along. That is what living always was. It's a real Wizard of Oz style approach. No place like home, it was in you all along, the dog being a penguin.   I don't think one ending is better than the other. I personally think the TV series is clever and well executed, but the EoE is the actual resolution to the plot and while that is 'less important' it is still, you know, important.   Note I would say that clinical or chemical depression, bipolar, schizophrenia and other disorders like that aren't necessarily what are being covered in this series. Many of the characters have clear environmental sources, in fact many of them show PTSD symptoms. I could understand how someone who is suffering clinical depression might find the insights and the progress he makes contrived as a result, though I would invite them to reflect on the way their disorders also tend to be comorbid with anxiety disorders and the ways people often have to disassemble those concurrent to dealing with their chemical imbalances. 
Too much.
Because the S is a big car and I don't need that much space. I drove an IS350 for 10 years and it was the right size for my needs. I upgraded to the S because I wanted a fast electric car and couldn't stand to wait for the 3. 
i think you are confusing a statement of fact with an opinion.
20 in int, 5 in sta iirc for all casters.
Still running on empty. :(
Your crackly puberty voice got tickets to this game and your on your damn phone!!!!!  
You can average 7-8 wins if you only play 5 matches
Always the DH, running a +6 dht and heading to dragon boss. Tell the dps to go easy on aoeing the blobs. The dh proceeds to fell rush, blade dance, fury then eye beam. Yay for 8 stacks of bursting. He ended up rage quitting because we weren't pulling fast enough and we had to 4 man it. This week sucks.
Done. Imgur link to a gallery of three images can be found near the top of the OP.
We had one of these in our house, I thought it was kinda cute until I found out these little guys are TERRIFYING LITTLE ASSASSINS. 
Umeå &lt;3
Is that ISO Joe?
Pray we never know for sure.
Not federally Mr. Sessions.
Where did you get Midnight Marauders? I was looking on Amazon and people are saying it's a bad pressing and the sound quality is terrible. I might go to my local record shop to pick it up, but it's only like $12 on Amazon.  Edit: And by the way, I like the pick ups. You never see Anthology on here, it's only ever MM or Low End. 
Too late unfortunately. It was a bird's nest though.
XB1 and PC but no PS4.  edit: on console you'll lose achievements though, on PC there's a re-enabler mod for them lol
It isn't, and wasn't, their land to begin with. The only loss of land occurred when they declared war on Israel in 1948, and people were displaced (Jews lost more land and more Jews were displaced, FYI), and Israel lost the West Bank and East Jerusalem, as well as Gaza, to the Arab states as they invaded.
The truth is every terror attack in U.S and Europe is an ongoing intelligence operation. It has absolutely nothing to do with what people have been misled to believe. Anyone that truly does their research and investigates this claim will come to the same conclusion as I have.
Would love an electron app! 
I highly support this trade and hope you take it (mainly bc I think my trade will go through and I reslly want Zucker, lol)
sweet sounds great, Which would you prefer the original or ruby? Dont want you to waste your time having to customize it :)
MEPS is picky because those guys aren't in the military yet. Once your active duty you can break every bone in your body, as long as you can P.T. adequately once your healed. Even then you can get a waiver.
Actually this is really similar to our group's audition process, but I was more referring to auditions for song-specific solo parts (i.e. who is Jason Derulo when the group is singing Whatcha Say). 
Once it's stippled, you can lick off the chicken grease and redistribute it to all the contact points of your firearm.
Am also a 5'9 woman. Can confirm this. I've literally been told that it must be hard to come to terms with the fact that I'll never be suitable for a husband. Gets brought up quite a lot actually. 
Man you red staters really are brain dead. Nobody disputes that the arena was sold out. Why is it so important to you to dispute fact? 
Please tell me you did something. I would do something.
Value on everything as a whole?
upvotes, all of you
It's about time, too. China desperately needs to build up their consumer base; focusing purely on what they have been so far can only end in a catastrophic blow-out.
It did happen but he overpaid. You can ask him. And I just noticed how much Tora dropped and it's 11-12 keys now. My bad
Wait which Anchor are you using because mine doesn't work
Don't you get it?!  It's easier to blame game mechanics then to own one's mistakes!
Are you from another dimension and your computer just leaks into ours? That has to be it right? &gt;One thing Whaley seemed to lack is a true philosophy. He just picked players without regard to how they'd fit on our team.  What does that even mean. 
?
I just did that too! So many rank up...hoping I can T2 carnage finally and then unlock as many as I can after. Wish me luck! 
Emmanuel Macron, while I am unsure he will be able to shake the country as he intend to, I cannot see the country in a good shape if Marine Le Pen is elected.
I'm glad you share this mindset :)
You have to trust us.  Also for $750 is this the best you wanna do?
Up to you. What ever amount of information which answers the question 'do I want to play with this guy on this champ?'
My dad retires this year and my family has always been in the same boat as you growing up. Although now I'm not religious at all, I still admire the hard work my father and his pastor buddies put into the community for the little amount of money they make.
Shit I always thought it was Louie Louie
Absolutely hyped for Kalisto to surf in on the dumpster halfway through the Braun-Roman match
Same same... Thailand. 
As a black redditor I used to let it bother me so many white redditors would say it doesn't exist in America. After my white privilege comment got 800 upvotes I realized at least some white people understood. Now I just try not to bring it up anymore online. 
Yes. You use the Knights emblem or you're a traitor.
Assume today.  Events have ended early before.
**READ THIS** /u/herbzandspicez,  your submission appears to be extremely short (less than 100 characters), so please make sure that it's within the subreddit [**rules**](/r/Drugs/wiki/rules), check out our Wiki pages on [**common drugs**](/r/Drugs/wiki/drugs) and the [**drug knowledge base**](/r/Drugs/wiki/knowledgebase) or use the search option.  After you've done a little research, feel free to write a few more sentences and [**resubmit**](/r/Drugs/submit?selftext=true) your post. You can also re-post this and include **"I was unable to find information on this in /r/Drugs/wiki/drugs."** in the text (not title!) of the post **to exempt yourself** from this rule. Users breaking the rules and using this bypass will be **banned**.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/Drugs) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Brick link is a little confusing though which is why I didn't use it in the past. A lot of sellers have a minimum purchase but only have 1 of the pieces I need for example. So it's not to easy. 
That's a really good thought. With my synergies Savard would be a 94 and would definitely play better than Weber. Reilly would be a huge upgrade over Jackman. Thanks! My other thought is waiting for 98 Richards and seeing what his synergies are. Thanks for taking a look at this for me. 
Fat Camp works
Tacos and beer.
I could probably have sex if I left the house more... That's what I keep telling myself anyway.  But also, Malcolm X and MLK had sex. Now they're dead. Coincidence? I think not.  Normies can stick to bumping nasties but I'll stick to getting ready for the revolution... And porn. 
You can't really compare them as Oracle is pos 4 or pos 5 and Legion/Abba are offlaners and False Promise also acts as a Shallow Grave with improved duration. Comparing him to Dazzle seems far better imo.  In 6.88, Oracle has received some important nerfs. Most significant one is base damage reduction, as it has put his damage below the necessary for zoning offlaners, so this means pos 5 Oracle is far weaker.  As I said in above post, he os one of the heroes who need either better talent and/or make it non-competing. As a pos 5, you want high cast range spells so you can cast it outside of harm, but his cast range talent is at level 25, which not only is hard to obtain from most games, but also competes with +2s ult duration. Level 20 talent is just useless as neither movement speed will save you neither extra intelligence is valuable at this point. 60 gpm at level 15 is too weak (Phoenix has 150, 2.5x more).  I'd probably do in this way:  * Level 10: 20% experience gain or +15 intelligence * Level 15: +150 cast range or +120 gold per minute * Level 20: -40s respawn time or +300 health * Level 25: +2s False Promise duration or XX   Another thing that could make improvement is Fate's Edict being two separate effects instead of a single effect and allied dispel only dispelling the disarm instead of disarm + magic resistance. Before, this could be justified as improving the skill cap, but after 6.86 giving Oracle the chance of dispelling allies and Guardian Greaves/Lotus Orb, there are big chances that Fate's Edict will be dispelled by the other support/offlaner consequently to Lotus Orb use.
Priest.
At least Lucio would have healing and movement. Symmetra would just have her turrets so she isn't that good. I think Bastion would be a jobber. Most definitely. 
Ok, last point he addressed is key. China, is now the worlds leader is renewable tech and implementation. Russia, is just as shitty as America when run by republicans but far far less influential. Climate change and nuclear war are clearly the two most dangerous threats to humanity. Nuclear relations actually still hinges on negotiations. Climate change does too, however, a huge negotiation was held and a solution agreed upon in Paris. Republicans now want to reneg on that. 
Sadly this is in fact what is considered PR in the social media age. Admen have managed to convince higher ups that discussion is good for branding. Some firms' social media deliberately post antagonistic stuff to "generate debate" about their brand. I guarantee you there is some advertising exec/talking head who's convinced that United's debacle will be good for them in the long run. Not that I think Capcom is smart enough to plan this stuff ahead, but we do live in a world where sadly this is the state of professionalism.
they hate ANA because "they're JEALOUS of him" !
That does suck, but at least you gained some experience talking to a girl and you aren't kissless. Bad experiences are something you can learn from and you'll at least know what it's like to have had something for a brief moment. But having no experience means you'll never know what it's like.
that splatoon theme is one of my favorite parts of this game lol
* Donald Trump JR "Russians make up a pretty disproportionate cross-section of a lot of our assets. We see a lot of money pouring in from Russia" [Source](http://time.com/4433880/donald-trump-ties-to-russia/)  * "I had a great weekend with you and your family. You have done a FANTASTIC job. TRUMP TOWER-MOSCOW is next. EMIN was WOW!" [Source](https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/399939505924628480)  * "I have plans to start business in Russia," Trump said, "I am currently in talks with several Russian companies to build a skyscraper on the model of Trump Tower in New York." The businessman did not name his partners or the size of the investment." [Source](https://themoscowtimes.com/articles/donald-trump-planning-skyscraper-in-moscow-29441)  * Trump appears in a music video by the son of Aras Agalarov. [Source](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=iuZUNjFsgS8)  * "What do I have to do with Russia? You know the closest I came to Russia, I bought a house a number of years ago in Palm Beach, Florida... for $40 million and I sold it to a Russian for $100 million including brokerage commissions." [Source](http://money.cnn.com/2016/07/27/news/donald-trump-russian-deal-mansion/)  * Trump asks Russia to hack Hillary publicly. [Source](https://www.nytimes.com/2016/07/28/us/politics/donald-trump-russia-clinton-emails.html)   * Trump campaign specifically pushes pro-Putin move to Republican platform (Under Manafort) [Source](http://www.npr.org/2016/08/06/488876597/how-the-trump-campaign-weakened-the-republican-platform-on-aid-to-ukraine)  * Donald Trump gave an interview Thursday that aired on a television station funded by the Kremlin, arguing that the Russian government was "probably" not meddling in the American presidential race. [Source](http://www.cnn.com/2016/09/08/politics/russia-television-donald-trump-interview/)  * In May 2014, the CNI hosted a roundtable discussion at which the director of the Kremlin-backed Institute for Democracy and Cooperation strongly defended Russia’s position in Ukraine. In April, Trump chose the CNI as the venue for his first major foreign policy speech, and the audience included Russian Ambassador to the U.S. Sergey Kislyak. [Source](http://www.newsweek.com/2016/09/09/vladimir-putin-donald-trump-493946.html)  * How did an alleged notorious Russian mobster connected to an illegal international gambling ring run out of Trump Tower end up as a special guest at a Trump event in Moscow in 2013? [Source](http://www.motherjones.com/politics/2016/09/trump-russian-mobster-tokhtakhounov-miss-universe-moscow)   * Millian claims he helped market Trump Condos in Russia. [Source](http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/russia-trump-political-conflict-zone/story?id=42263092)   * Trump brought Ms. Universe Pageant to Russia. Was paid for by Aras Agalarov, a man allegedly close ties to Putin. [Source](http://www.politico.com/blogs/2016-presidential-debate-fact-check/2016/10/contrary-to-his-claims-there-is-evidence-that-trump-does-business-with-russians-229484)  * NYT report looking at Trump trying to get real-estate deals in Russia over 3 decades. [Source](https://www.nytimes.com/2017/01/16/us/politics/donald-trump-russia-business.html)  * Abe says Trump encouraged him to boost ties, dialogue with Putin to resolve territorial issue. [Source](http://www.japantimes.co.jp/news/2017/02/14/national/politics-diplomacy/abe-says-trump-encouraged-boost-ties-dialogue-putin/#.WKZvCX9QVCf)  * Trump Reverses Pledge To Mandate U.S. Steel For Keystone Pipeline. A Direct Beneficiary Is A Russian Oligarch With Close Ties To Vladimir Putin [Source](http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/trump-reverses-pledge-to-mandate-us-steel-for-keystone_us_58bbae99e4b0fa65b844b451)   * Ivanka was at a party in Russia with the wife of Putin Pal/Rosneft investor who is supplying the steel.  [Source](https://www.instagram.com/p/kBmFGdCkP4/) Kushner was also on this trip with Ivanka. [Source](https://www.instagram.com/p/kBmRuACkP9/) * Ivanka and Kushner went to the US open with Abramovich's wife. [Source](http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-3784716/Ivanka-Trump-Karlie-Kloss-Wendi-Deng-Murdoch-watch-Open.html)   * "Trump personally met with the Russian ambassador on April 27, 2016, prior to a major foreign policy speech. The Wall Street Journal, in a report that was little-noticed at the time" Trump used the speech to call for warmer relations with Russia. [Source](https://thinkprogress.org/trump-personally-met-with-russian-ambassador-during-campaign-cc59ae305032#.m1lpo2kbd)  * U.S. government sanctioned Dmitry Rogozin—a hardline deputy to Vladimir Putin, the head of Russia’s defense industry and longtime opponent of American power—in retaliation for the invasion of Crimea and eastern Ukraine. [Source](http://www.thedailybeast.com/articles/2017/03/07/top-trump-ally-met-with-putin-s-deputy-in-moscow.html) Eighteen months later, the National Rifle Association, Donald Trump’s most powerful outside ally during the 2016 election, sent a delegation to Moscow that met with him.  * RNC paid intel firm with ties to Russians to find dirt on Clinton. [Source](http://www.politico.com/story/2017/03/rnc-hillary-clinton-intelligence-firm-payments-236436)  * Trump adds Russia scholar as a National Security Council director [Source](https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/trump-adds-russia-scholar-as-national-security-council-director/2017/03/28/927d0332-13f5-11e7-9e4f-09aa75d3ec57_story.html?tid=ss_in&amp;utm_term=.57a9d7eb94a2) * Trump silent amid protests in Russia. [Source](https://foreignpolicy.com/2017/03/29/trumps-silence-on-russias-corruption-protests-shows-just-how-big-putin-won-in-taking-down-hillary-clinton/)  * The White House abruptly canceled a scheduled meeting in February between President Trump and a high-level Russian central banker after a national security aide discovered the official had been named by Spanish police as a suspected “godfather” of an organized crime and money-laundering ring. [Source](https://www.yahoo.com/news/white-house-pulled-out-of-meet-and-greet-with-conservatives-favorite-russian-a-suspected-mobster-060026495.html) * "Almost all of the oligarchs were in the room," Trump bragged. [Source](https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/inside-trumps-financial-ties-to-russia-and-his-unusual-flattery-of-vladimir-putin/2016/06/17/dbdcaac8-31a6-11e6-8ff7-7b6c1998b7a0_story.html?utm_term=.e0c752e5bffc)  * "You know, I was in Moscow a couple of months ago. I own the Miss Universe Pageant and they treated me so great. Putin even sent me a present, a beautiful present." [Source](http://www.businessinsider.com/donald-trump-vladimir-putin-strong-leader-obama-2016-9)  * Trump claims he met Putin. "Yes, a long time ago," Trump said. "[Putin and I] got along great, by the way.""  [Source](http://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/americas/donald-trump-putin-presidential-debate-ive-never-met-him-fact-check-a7371061.html)  * Trump has a relationship with Putin. "I do have a relationship and I can tell you he's very interested in what we're doing here today he's probably very interested in what you and I are saying today and I'm sure he's going to be seeing it in some form and I do have a relationship with him and I think its very interesting to see what's happened." "He's done a very brilliant job in terms of what he represents and who he is representing. "[Source](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=nqT3h7f_tKE)  * "I have nothing to do with Russia," he told reporters. “To the best of my knowledge, no person that I deal with does." [Source](https://www.nytimes.com/2017/02/20/us/politics/donald-trump-russia.html)  * ""Look at Putin -- what he's doing with Russia -- I mean, you know, what's going on over there. I mean this guy has done -- whether you like him or don't like him -- he's doing a great job in rebuilding the image of Russia and also rebuilding Russia period" [Source](http://www.cnn.com/2016/07/28/politics/donald-trump-vladimir-putin-quotes/)  * "So what I would do—as an example, I own Miss Universe, I was in Russia, I was in Moscow recently and I spoke, indirectly and directly, with President Putin, who could not have been nicer, and we had a tremendous success."[ Source](http://www.motherjones.com/politics/2016/07/watch-trump-brag-of-speaking-to-vladimir-putin)  * "I think I would just get along very well with Vladimir Putin. I just think so. People say what do you mean? I just think we would. Obama and him, he hates Obama. Obama hates him. We have unbelievably bad relationships." [Source](http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/worldnews/northamerica/usa/11775145/Donald-Trump-Id-get-on-very-well-with-Putin-if-I-were-president.html)  * "I’ve always felt fine about Putin. I think that he’s a strong leader" [Source](http://www.politico.com/story/2015/12/trump-praises-putin-216929)  * "If Putin respects me and if Putin wants to call me brilliant and other things that he said that were frankly very nice, I'll accept that, and I'll accept it on behalf of our country," [Source](http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/donald-trump-hell-fine-russian-president-vladimir-putin/story?id=35872623)  * "If he says great things about me, I'm going to say great things about him," the Republican nominee said. “I’ve already said he is very much of a leader. The man has very strong control over his country" [Source](http://www.businessinsider.com/donald-trump-vladimir-putin-strong-leader-obama-2016-9)  * Trump says he’s never seen proof of Putin killing Journalists on ABC. [Source](http://www.cbsnews.com/news/donald-trump-defends-putins-record-on-killing-journalists/)  * "“He’s not going into Ukraine," Trump said. “He’s not going to go into Ukraine. You can mark it down. You can put it down. You can take it anywhere you want.” “He’s already there isn’t he?” Stephanopoulos said. “Well, he’s there in a certain way,” [Source](http://www.mediaite.com/uncategorized/pence-says-trump-knew-that-russia-invaded-crimea-heres-what-trump-actually-said/)
Thanks.
I don't know how to do that. I wouldn't do it, i don't want anything to do with it. I don't have money to do that. 
Bronze in the Men's V8 at the Garden State Scholastic Championships!   (Also, TIL that Montclair has a lot of British rowers and coaches)
i have the Charge HR and its been perfect almost every time. is it defective maybe?
i mean, theyre blackhawks fans  i like him too though, he is very passionate
Okay thank you.:)
I was doing it on my phone, I couldn't do it.
Es muy chota, si :c
Pam walked in on Cyril in the process of embezzling the money from the ISIS accounts. He claimed he was "just jacking it;" Pam asked to watch. They both got really wasted and woke up naked in Cyril's office, after which he discovered he'd transferred all the ISIS money into Swiss accounts for which he'd forgotten the password. Pam suggests they try "state-dependent memory," so they get blackout-drunk again, wake up naked, again, then Pam tells Cyril to try "Guest."  The implication is that they fucked twice.
Conceding, based on what was literally in the article and has been discussed in this post, that KJU was born into a life surrounded by people looking to take his place, and managed to play the field, so therefore he has an understanding of strategic maneuvers and shouldn't be perceived as a reckless fool. And if you recall, we're in a thread discussing how shitty this subreddit has gotten, so it's fair to point out that the general consensus in here and in /r/politics is that as long as Trump said it, it must be ridiculed. As evidenced by the fact that a claim that is strongly supported here is then turned around and reposted in a clickbait fashion with the main appeal being that Trump said it so he must be instigating something. And sure Trump's administration is trying to sell a war, but it's one that will happen if nothing is done to prevent it, because that's the whole point of all these missile tests that have been going on lately. Or is the entire world just playing along with the Trump administration and pretending like NK is purposefully demonstrating that it's quickly becoming a viable force to be reckoned with, all so that Trump can get approval ratings.
"What a brave woman Maryse is" Corey Graves is a gem that we aren't worthy of having 
Pilot G-2, in some weird pascal color (so it doesn't walk off) but inside is a Mont Blanc refill, requires trimming of the plastic top bit to fit.
The doublethink is amazing.  None were convicted 
Perso mon vote n'est pas truqué, il est là pour faire perdre MLP et l'envoyer chez les juges.
There are a couple but I don't remember the names. The contract on water hag in Skellige, the one in that cave I really dislike, also the Fyke Isle qestline because you have to run here and there, plus it's creeppy as fuck. Almost all tresure hunts are kinda meh after your first playthrough and horse riding is just plain bad and boring. On that note, fistfighting quests, never did them, never will. I dislike most quests that make me travel more than they make me do actual stuff, but as you said, I've played the game numerous times now so some quests become repetitive.
**Reminder to all participants:**  RGD is strictly moderated! Before participating, be sure to read and understand [the rules.](http://www.reddit.com/r/redditgetsdrawn/wiki/index) Please direct any questions or concerns to modmail.   **^Replies ^to ^this ^comment ^will ^be ^removed.** ___  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/redditgetsdrawn) if you have any questions or concerns.*
You will see cosmic shenanigans - and rich. As to how - you must let a gentleman have his secrets for now. 
Was ist in Planung? Upgradelader, Liberty Walk? Oder eher ruhig und erstmal fahren? Viel Spaß mit dem Teil.
Better than my .05btc loss on DASH.  Why did I speculate on a few shares thinking it will to to 100?  I really don't like DASH I was just bored.
I'm not sure about brutal, but I know that on Hard you can't put the speed below "fast", so I assumed on brutal it's the same or you can only play on "fastest".
Catch up mechanic is not active on console. 
&gt; Madoka's line to Sayaka  I think it's a slight translation issue with the tense. Having checked several fan translations, I think Madoka's saying that in order to save Sayaka from dying in the new timeline, she *would have* had to undo her wish, but she knew Sayaka wouldn't want that.
Savage
Most people regret 6\*ing Lapis a few months past GB10, you're a little too early for that lol 
it should, but it will take a long time. I can estimate that the shadow pack has atleast 500k sales. The highest it could reach is three seers, just guessing.
Username checks out :)
The refreshrate of that monitor is 144hz, would not downgrade at all.... 60hz to 144hz in a gaming scenario is huuuge!!
I apologize to any nazis I offended when I compared them to As'kthul.
She's adorable 
I... don't understand what's ironic about that.
People want uw @ 1080p buy it also has 144hz. That's point.
Downside: Smacking that ass would hurt.
Oh gotcha, I read your second sentence wrong. 
Bloodcat
Where'd you get that bed?
I appreciate what you have done for me sir.  I haven't been able to watch Chip live yet.   I've been fooled it's not actually live.  I don't appreciate you anymore.
I also know zero women who are like "oh, nbd,  I'll just pop over to planned parenthood and get a quick abortion before going out tonight." Women take this decision very seriously. 
Nazism *was* more threatening than Wahhabi Islam, only because it was adopted early-mid 20th century Germans who were far more organized, and capable of making thier vision a reality, than modern Middle-Eastern populations.
actually I put that in there. there is one for lala as well
And now his buddies don't know it's open
Am I the only one here who thinks this shouldn't be a problem?   You were introduced outside of work, he doesn't work for the company, what you do in your private time is your business and nobody else's.   Tell her you're going to date her brother. 
This is a RAW PPV.
If you like this one I'd recommend utsuho and yumeko's theme. Owen was her is oveeeeeeerated! 
Yep  US 24 to CO-9 FTW
It's fucking irresponsible if you ask me
There was very clear issues with Russia already which is what made them turn to Communism.   Correlation=/=causation.
I've heard Melbourne be compared to Portland in the past.
Do I put elder Kai's on int gogeta or ssj4 goku? Thank you
I actually don't think you can buy a home in Sydney for that. 
Mine is sa 3
D
No, I'm sure he was talking about the countries with the highest rates of this, who happen to have very few black people.   If someone in a comment section for an article about India mentions that it's mostly Muslims doing this, do you link to the christian/atheist white dudes in America and do it and say "no it's not"?  Completely different contexts. The only thing in common in those two contexts is the objectification of women and the abundant availability of cheap, strong acids.   Even though homeboy comes off as racist, he's clearly not saying black people are invading the countries where this happens the most or some shit. He's talking about the incidences in Italy, which yeah largely have involved men from Africa or of African descent according to the news, although Italy is racist as shit (not all Italians, but seriously Italy makes America look progressive when it comes to black people) so it's media may be cherry picking. 
noice stickin it to the man. you should post this over in r/madlads
Watching my insides -- the skinned glow-worm writhings
Can confirm 
+1 - the location shots for this show were apparently shot in Toronto (much like "Orphan Black")
Although a large influx of similar questions can be annoying, its like asking people to not ask questions about Vikings, or pirates, because they are popular and lots of questions got asked about them.  As others below have said, this trend will likely fizzle out soon enough, there are only so many times people will upvote the same stuff.  Though I think it might have sparked some interest in the (night) lives of commoners throughout the ages though. I've never really thought of what an average (young man) joe would do with his disposable income during the late hours of the day, and night. I've read (some) of the (translations) of the graffiti in Pompeii, and although I kinda smirked a bit at the writings, and how similar it is to today's bathroom graffiti. But I never really thought much past that, I never thought about what they were doing, I just assumed they were out drinking, maybe they would pay a whore, then go home to sleep.
The best marriage choice is to not take your marriage or your partner for granted.
I don't know if it's been said already, but the first rule of CrossFit is never shut the fuck up about CrossFit.
*Speaks into dictaphone* Idea for sitcom: Man amongst Monsters.
Looks more like rosacea
Probably trackers to stop spoofers, but some bot accounts are level 30+
No.
I'm glad you think it's funny enough to write lol, but they are all not 1440-1800. Some upgrade to 1080p but add 60 fps mode.   Some won't and don't even have native 4k, they just get a fancy upgrade when processed.   Also, HDR is a mess with many different versions so depending on what tv you buy, the Pro might need even use HDR.   There's more to a game having Pro support than just making it 1440-1800.
I think you've misspelled  T H I C C
The ass was my only concern. To my knowledge feet can be upright 
Only shit I see is Chikorita. Literally the worst gen 2 starter as far as actual combat prowess goes.   If it weren't cute I would have never picked it as a kid.
O fug
I have to agree with your opening statement regarding high school science. When I think back to studying biology and chemistry in school, there was minimal mention of the scientific method, or how to conduct a scientific experiment. Only through our research assignment, conducted once in the year, did we briefly examine "how to design an experiment", "how to collect data" etc etc. During regular classes all the emphasis was put on the various chem or bio topics, no focus on science itself.
The fingers are probably the best part
http://plays.tv/video/58e1a00362dea06997/cucked-by-daybreak?from=user  You don't like bombs ruining your 20 bombs?
Now I can't think of how to actually spell modified 
It's a keyblade
I agree, but I would love to see some hints to it. Like Matt slowly becoming more erratic on Raw and such.
The quality in question being mid-tier at best. 
Your post has been removed because plays.tv links must be submitted in text post form under the short-duration content rule.  If you're not familiar with the subreddit rules, you can read them [here](http://reddit.com/r/leagueoflegends/w/subredditrules).   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/leagueoflegends) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Wasn't even motivated enough to put a top on either
&gt; Dear /r/btc, would you support a hard fork to bigger blocks if it came with a POW algo change?   Fuck, no.
Dessert Gallery is the shit. I love their italian cream cake. Nom.
Good will here is very overpriced, but we are lucky enough to have a Goodwill Outlet, where everything is a dollar a pound - and they will bargain down on heavier items. It's totally unsorted randomness, however.
This submission has been automatically removed because it has 3 words or less. Please write your question in a proper full sentence, thank you.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
 As a reminder, this subreddit [is for civil discussion.](https://www.reddit.com/r/politics/wiki/rulesandregs#wiki_please_be_civil)  In general, be courteous to others. Attack ideas, not users. Personal insults, shill or troll accusations, hate speech, and other incivility violations can result in a permanent ban.  If you see comments in violation of our rules, please report them.  ***   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/politics) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Try mobile through a browser (not YouTube app)
Don't forget to mention that all agencies involved have formally given up the search, so we will likely never know.
Azuras wrath
I want to be known as a successful attractive dude instead of just being known for 'getting better'. 
One problem is that it doesn't look uncomfortable. 
*zenyatta
Obligatory how did he marry Madison Rayne, oh well never liked her anyway 
**To Highlight:**  *How One is Brought Up,*  Will especially correlate with the way a person Responds in this thread: Infp or Not.
smoke more
Akeno how did you get to lvl 100+ and have Mashu graduate to SR without changing your support list from solo mashu with no CEs lmao. 
well played sir, well played. Have an upvote. 
&gt;Actually quite helpful to have on.   Except team colors are never specified.
Thank you, I try aha
Can Reigns over come the odds?
Different show
Cotton candy
Learning Spanish will be VERY helpful to learn Portuguese. I reached B2 level at Portuguese in about 6 months at a slow-moderate pace. 
Backstory? 
ITT: Google apologists ignoring the fact that this has been shown already to be a thing and how Google does ads, and pretending that Op is "just crazy".  Jesus people. Google is not an angel and it's pathetic that the apologists come out of the woodwork every time someone comes forward about Google using their services and hardware to monitor people in a more shady way than usual. 
Hope this experiment helps give some insight. Keep up the good work OP
so hot! 
Why would it be too expensive?  Insurance is only expensive when there is a high risk ( cost ) associated with it. That's why smokers have limited life insurance choices. I thought the NRA position was that guns are not harmful, why would there be high costs associated with them. 
Rcbow and broads mate
I dated a woman with BPD. This article is very accurate.
So are Elimination Chamber, Hell in a Cell and Survivor Series.
I've been needing this for so long. Thank you!
Okay the brighten up teasers are starting to get stale, but good job!
First five picks... very happy!  Next one... OK.  A 6th rounder on a long snapper... WTF?  Lastly, I'm good with... I think Adams will likely play inside. 
Am I the only one who heard that in George Costanza's voice?
So now there's one more place to hang out. There are already dozens of WordPress-related groups on Facebook and we have StackExchange, the official Slack and the official forums. I do believe the old irc-channels on freenode.net are active as well.
There's no reason to guess that based on the information provided. He didn't even say anything to indicate that is closing on negative terms. It could be that the owners are just moving cross country to be closer to family. Maybe there's some medical hardship. Maybe they're retiring and the kids don't want to take over the business because they have their own careers. There are plenty of reasons for a store to be closing that aren't tied to lack of community support.
## Sorry. Your post has been removed from /r/BoomBeach for the following reasons:  ### No recruitment posts unless you're an [official Reddit Task Force](/r/BoomBeach/wiki/taskforces).  Learn how to [get your Task Force verified as official here](/r/BoomBeach/wiki/taskforceapplication).  Please post to [/r/BoomBeachRecruit](/r/boombeachrecruit) instead.  ---  ####If you have any questions or concerns, or if you feel this determination is in error, please [message the moderators](https://www\.reddit\.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FBoomBeach&amp;subject=about my removed submission&amp;message=I'm writing to you about the following submission: https://www.reddit.com/r/BoomBeach/comments/68i7mu/join_my_task_force_pigeon_squad_looking_for/. %0D%0DMy issue is...).  #####Direct replies to official mod comments will be removed.  ####Continued posting against the rules will result in being banned from the community.
&gt; But thank you so much for changing my view. You made me even more convinced. Your response epitomized everything wrong with BLM and their supporters.   How is it logical to change your view to be more strong based on arguments you don't like?  Someone makes a straw man (that's not what a straw man is, but let's assume it is for now), then why would it convince you of the opposite?  That doesn't make any sense.  Clearly there's a strong emotional investment here on your part... there's nothing inherently wrong with that, but it's something you need to acknowledge. This is the second time you've perceived a direct accusation of racism where none existed.  You appear very, very motivated to shift the conversation to that, and when you feel like an accusation of prejudice has been made, it seems to make you quite angry and upset. It's fine that you feel this way, but do you see how it's a potential problem if you  start seeing your own feelings about racism as central to the issue of how Black people are treated in the US?   &gt;How many people you kill is the degree to which you are engaged in ethnic cleansing. That's the metric of ethnic cleansing: murders. You then proceed with another massive straw man. I didn't say one man from Toronto is my reason. First of all it's a woman. More importantly, I said her, the founder of the entire movement, dozens of others, and the statements released by the organization itself are the problem. No I didn't list literally every statement every person associated with BLM has ever said in the OP.  If these statements exist, you didn't supply them.... all I can go on is what you said.  You had one quote that was extreme (the Toronto person), one quote that was hyperbole, and later, one totally mundane point about the school-to-prison pipeline that you confusingly interpreted as some kind of accusation of personal racism.  These are, to put it colloquially, weaksauce.  You keep implying there's all these terrible quotes that you won't say, but I don't have access to those, so how am I supposed to address them?  My point with the post you're replying to is that you are, for someone who supposedly cares about racial justice, spouting all the usual suspects people use to reject Black Lives Matter.  Your argument here is indistinguishable from someone that of someone on the alt-right... you're using the same quotes and evidence and arguments they use. You say you agree with the basic ideas of BLM, but every time a specific issue is down on the table, you're against it.  You disagree with the school-to-prison pipeline, and potentially institutional racism in education generally.  You disagree with the idea that police shoot black people dispoportionately.  These things are *a major part* of caring about racial issues in the US.  If you disagree with them, you don't just dislike how BLM talks, you disagree with progressive politics in terms of these issues.  And that's fine (I disagree with it, but it's fine), but it's impossible to do this and also have to maintain the self-concept that you agree with all the issues. &gt; Finally, rejecting the main group trying to accomplish goals is not practically the same thing at all.   Then what are you doing to address this problem yourself?  If the issue is important to you, but you don't like BLM, have you... I dunno, started your own group?  Practically, what's the difference between rejecting BLM and rejecting these issues altogether... especially when your priorities seem to be your own discomfort about being called racist?
Yes, it was. And that canon included the so-called "Apocrypha".
Edison is definitely a great choice thanks to his 3rd skill. I will keep Illya as my "all" support, unless i roll Meltlilith which will not happen thanks to my rng. Still don't know if i'll rush her 10/10/10, as her 2nd skill isn't that important to level out ( to me at least )
"Sounds like we gotta couple of ghosts in the audience."
You know maybe I do.  But---and there's a big one  I've never cheated on her. She's never cheated on me and we are working toward year 21.  So you can choose to ignore my words or not but they have worked for me. For a very long time that seems to be outside the norm for couples today. 
Sobre fuga das galinhas. No meu Ensino Fundamental (se nao me engano) tive um professor de história que passou esse filme justamente para fazer uma avaliação assim. E é verdade. 
Thanks for the advice, but I really want to this class in that specific section since I know that the professor is great! I just simply want the percentage of chance that I get into the class since this the first time I get waitlisted.
Big animals?...
Sets a Nonce Generator in the VRam which could save your jailbreak.  Get Version 3.1 to use it as 2.0, 2.1 and 3.0 does not work
Here we go, Ladies and gentlemen. 
soz
If that doesn't work you can always try necrophilia
What about the "Arin Eats ____" series? At least Doodle Doods is funny and related to their roots/actual careers
This is the most Middle Aged man instagram post I've ever seen.
So, yes, they are screwed - especially if they're already near the end of their lives.
T H I C C 
define "ankle problems" ?
Okuyasu could have been used by making him a semi-pacifist sorta like X from the MegaMan series, insanely overpowered ability but doesn't have the heart to kill anyone with it
Could we please show some class in victory? The series is over. Chill the fuck out. 
\&gt;stale meme  \&gt;using meme.exe in [current year]
Y'all turned Sasha into a meme, and Sasha did the same back to this subreddit
I got carded for a lighter the other day.  I'm 33 with a good amount of gray hair.   I was confused. 
H
Here are a few other pics in some better lighting just to be sure. Worried about corrosion as I do recall goofing around when I first got it and cutting a watermelon.   http://imgur.com/a/VoPTS
you and your friend mark are gonna stop watching!
Jarhead. When Jake Gyllenhaal is looking in the mirror and "Something in the Way" by Nirvana starts to play. 
I always hate admitting this, but the very first time I did h, I shared needles with someone I *knew* had hep C.   I was suicidal at the time and didn't give a fuck if I got it because I didn't plan to live much longer anyway. I just wanted to get fucked up and not feel.   That was close to a decade ago and I've been tested a million times since then (because I do have cirrhosis and so I've had far too many hospital/gastroenterologist trips) and by some crazy anomaly, I didn't manage to acquire it.   I obviously don't advocate doing that. I was young and stupid and I'm a lot more careful now. But I still make irresponsible choices like any addict.   In the moment, you just don't care like you should. 
A seriously **high energy** way to start your day.
Just wanted to hop on and say I'm *so* glad that this is on your roadmap. Bear has quickly become my go-to place for writing and note-taking.   Having seen Apple recently add support for encrypting notes with local keys, this couldn't come quickly enough! Any update on where this falls on the roadmap?
no it doesn't. this kind of absolutionist thinking is why everything is fucked up.because condemning something but doing nothing to help is just hypocritical and by your thinking the same as doing the oppression. the world is very diverse and working in it requires us to allow a lot of ugly truths to live on. you have to pick your fights. and progress is a slow and bloody affair. no change comes easy.
Connect four! I'm the reigning champ in my family. Nobody can beat me. 
How does this drummer still have arms and legs. Mine would've fallen off 
He's high as a kite tho
Why do you think that? I think the video was pretty good and so was the feedback
The best way is to get slices punched into your asshole
Hello, and welcome to /r/Republican. Please understand this subreddit's primary purpose is for Republicans to discuss issues facing the party. Out of respect for this sub's main topic, we ask that [unless you identify as Republican that you leave the vote button alone](https://www.reddit.com/r/MetaRepublican/comments/5t017a/this_sub_is_for_republicans_if_you_do_not/). Non republicans who come to our sub looking for a 'different perspective' subvert that very perspective with their own views when they vote in a sub where they agree with very little.  (It's like down voting a post in '/r/chocolate' because you don't like chocolate).  We can gain 'other perspectives' by viewing the other left leaning political subs. We like our sub the way it is. Additionally, please ensure to follow our rules about [leftist comments and anti-republican criticisms](https://www.reddit.com/r/Republican/comments/5q4jhq/we_will_allow_critisms_of_presedent_trump/).  We allow comments from non-republicans but we take our 6 rules very seriously.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/Republican) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Nice job stealing memes from r/PrequelMemes which are only a day old!
Thank you!
I'll give them that. The only lyric I know to their national anthem is "Ohhhhh Canadaaaaa"
Alright.
Madurai also has the niche benefit of turning the redeemer into the best-scaling weapon for armor stripping in the game.
Hell yeah, even being a Kanna Kamui (Ainu Goddess of Lightning) worshipper can't save him..... -_-
Bull fucking shit. Hillary would've been way better than Trump. For starters she's actually competent.
I'd really like to see the Banner persona in the Hulk body though.
I've asked this before but I never got any answers: Are there any boxsets that Survivor seasons are sold in? All I've found are single DVDs for each season and I'm looking to purchase multiple (if not all) seasons at the same time.
I have the original and the nano but both of those are RTAs. My buddy has the subtank version and he loves it, I personally have not tried it.
*ass-raping?
As a recently cancelled Sprint customer you're absolutely right. I no longer call ppl using cellular if at all possible... Especially while in the car.   Sprint was so bad in a major metro location that I realized after having them for ~2 years that I would no longer talk to anybody on my way home to/from the gym (20min drive) due to their network being so bad. I'd prefer not talking on the phone so much that I was being less sociable.   TMo has been significantly better better than AT&amp;T even.  
Good guy with patience. Been working with him since January and since then I'm getting good grades in my assignments. Would recommend
Then I will live the rest of my life as Dawayne Johnson...not to bad imo.
It would've been centurion but it seems like everyone is excited for him already, shinobi needs love to. And for me I love the samurai especially when the game was announced. Only problem is the term "weeb" when Joining the samurai which is what I hate 
Ambrose vs. Balor vs. Miz for the IC title.
The title of the movie is a spoiler. I figured it out immediately. I did not like the movie. 
I guess it's time to face reality and try to slowly cut bonds with him although I still want to be friends with him but not expect anything more than that. Thanks for slapping me with the truth.
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JoRQEQUi9NM
My parents attend a church in the midwest, and it just keeps getting smaller, while the remaining parishioners keep getting older. They can't afford a full-time pastor anymore, so they have a guy who works in manufacturing the rest of the week.  It's sad when I go home to visit. They're not exactly a bastion of liberal values, but they're average people trying to stay connected to a community and practice their traditions as opposed to post-modern hedonists seeking prosperity and a weekly jolt of dopamine from dance and judgment. 
&gt;&gt; I think I move too slow for online dating.  &gt; Nope, not possible!  I respect where you (and a few others of similar mind) are coming from—and in fact I love reading your posts, Hera—but I am going to respectfully disagree with this one particular thing, and for a very specific reason: logistics.  Logistics, timing, and old age for me are currently forming a bit of a perfect storm.  I'm almost sixty, don't have a whole lot of time left, don't have a whole lot of extra time in general, and if I would have to spend three to sixth months dating someone in a sort of "slow mode"—and if I combine that with the two- to three-month period it seems to take to find the right person just to be dating the right person—then I'm only looking at potentially a few shots at this before I'm 70 and probably in permanent ED hell.  It's just not a viable strategy for someone in my position, especially since I'm going to be still working for awhile and hence can't devote 20 hours a week to socializing and meeting potential partners.  Believe me, I would love to do a "friends first" approach; I did that with a few people when I was in my twenties, with great results.  I don't have that much time for the investigative phase anymore, though.  It has to be much more on a fast track.  And from what I've seen, most people in their fifties are similarly inclined.  Just my two cents.  I think both sides of this coin are viable.
It's been said before but I miss our broadcast it's so hard to listen to the casters rooting for Edmonton and be forced to watch it.
LOL...worst attempt at subterfuge by r/the_dangle yet.
Your post history is laughable trolling, it's not convincing in the slightest. #THEY'RE NOT SENDING THEIR BEST#
uhhhh... [are you sure about that?](https://np.reddit.com/r/watchpeopledie/comments/6886xv/a_toddler_being_pulled_along_on_a_toy_scooter/dgwl0rn/?context=3).  4 posts down from this one currently.
still patiently waiting... But I'm super excited for you (:
Tossed between constipation and flashshits, tired but can't sleep, and a ton of other things - I needed that smile. Thanks.
I believe that's how it works.
Honestly, Ike's default skills are very good for him and Ike would still be pretty good with them.  For a C skill, I would recommend either a Hone skill to buff allies or a Threaten Skill to weaken your enemy before attacking them.  I personally did Threaten Defense to make it so he can do more damage, but Threaten Speed could help to prevent him from getting doubled by faster units or if your Ike is -Speed.  For a passive skill, you can really do anything you want, but a movement skill like Reposition, Swap, or Pivot would be recommended to get him into combat faster.  A rally skill wouldn't be bad either.  If you want to change Ike's default skills then you could give Ike Quick Riposte or Vantage to make him deadly on enemy phase.
Lips of an angel by Hinder. Sounds sweet until you actually listen to the lyrics.
https://i.imgur.com/VbuE1QE.png
Yes
I've sent a message but haven't heard back.  I didn't want to wait until too late at night to post this.
Haven't played the new Hitman yet, (or any of the series for that matter, but hoping to get it when Christmas or birthday rolls around), but the new one actually looks easier then the old one. Maybe because the playthroughs I watch go on easy mode, but that's my view.
 mE TRoO
The repeating texture on the locker doors really stands out to me.
It's in the middle of the desert. This is literally a drive-through park.
With yooooouuuuuu by my side...
I like to call it the Moron Label
I'm sorry, I'm sooooo confused, what is so bad about this? 
Frosty
"but you don't want to ruin what we have?" Jerad asked. Sighing, he said "I may have an idea, but I'm not sure if you will like it."
Head over to /r/anxiety. I think you will find a LOT of helpful ideas.   Edit: just realized I'm already in /r/anxiety and not /r/dae. Sorry bout that! 
If someone can spend 250k on a car they are not choosing between anything 
Not necessarily. Bluebird buses are highly coveted in the bus-to-home conversion crowd. 
Is that a chain or something available in the US? 
Post where you're located and maybe someone here can offer you that service until you're back on your feet?
Better they are there though!
Topeka syndrome: acting like you are better than your neighbors but secretly wishing you were them 
If you know his password I'd get on his acc and sell all the skins for 3 cents. As far as he knows, he was hacked.
Trade verified!
With posts like this, I always feel like OP's unspoken message is, "why are all you people stupid enough to like something?"
135  Destiny 
Done.  😊
This one says 33% better https://www.techpowerup.com/gpudb/2938/radeon-rx-580
**Attention! [Serious] Tag Notice**  * Jokes, puns, and off-topic comments are not permitted in **any** comment, parent or child.  * Parent comments that aren't from the target group will be removed, along with their child replies.   * Report comments that violate these rules.  Posts that have few relevant answers within the first hour, and posts that are not appropriate for the [Serious] tag will be removed. Consider doing an AMA request instead.  Thanks for your cooperation and enjoy the discussion!   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I've been totally into this extremely attractive co-worker. We flirted for months until we finally got physical. For the next several months that followed, she fulfilled a lot of at-work fantasies. She'd get on her knees and give me a blowjob. She would totally get into it and would tell me to cum in her mouth, and of course, she swallowed. I'd get regular handjobs from her early mornings at her workstation before anybody in her area showed up. I'd often get to fingerbang her and even suck her tits. I titty fucker her too! Bless her amazing tits! I once made her fingerbang herself so I could suck her finger. Damn did her pussy taste good! Although she didn't let it be know, it was clear she was a freak. One time some of my cum got on her pants and she proudly left it there the whole day. Even in the middle of the workday, if nobody was around, she'd let me grab her tits, pussy, and ass. We eventually stopped doing this at work because she was afraid we'd get caught (there were a few close calls). We'd occasionally meet up after work for some beers. One of those times, we ended in the back of her car and she gave me an amazing blowjob. I thought she was getting into it when we'd do this at work, but (as she explained) being in a situation where we would not get caught, she *really* got into it. We talked about many other fantasies she'd be more than willing to fulfill but we never got around to it. She wanted to stop because she was feeling guilty. 
Name: Derp Herpson Nickname: "Flurghurger" Nationality: Random Voice: Beagle or one of the US voices  Other: face should be mostly concealed- recommend crazy modded face if possible
Ate you saying the Chinese don't have any hackers?
They aren't locked, they can change 2 players.  Personally I don't see them making a change with contracts and all, and Loony kinda is Rise now, and he would probably be the most expendable one, but I dont see the org turning their back on him. Also the 4 of them are great players, they just really need to work on Uplink.
Nice self gloating there buddy
I came.
The 2 programs I mentioned will help with Google Music also.
If you know his password I'd get on his acc and sell all the skins for 3 cents. As far as he knows, he was hacked.
Wow! Absolutely amazing that you can do this in blender.
I guess if you see an item on clearance that may be an indicator that they will be no longer stocking after they sell it.  Perhaps a good time to stash it?
I don't get it. 
His producer was doing jumping jacks mouthing the words, **NO NO NO**.
I know lol, I think I've read every single one of his comics
Ikr. My room at my dads house is bigger
[](/hmmm-i) There are different sized bits?
Lack of younger talent in the pipeline. Relying solely on veterans is not sustainable. There has to be some organic development occurring because stagnation is fatal.  Also, coaching seems to be an issue
"It should have been taken care of"   That's the line that scares me now. He's going to take care of it.
Maybe he really hates monks. Or [[Troll Ascetic]].
I sent you a PM
Exciting last few minutes. Now it feels more like we stole a win. Substitutions were really impactful. 
Didn't say I'd never heard of it, where did I say that?
You get 11 Orks in the box, 10 boyz and one nob.
Meh, I don't mind Roenick so long as the Hawks aren't playing. He's about the only NBC blowhard I can stomach during intermissions.
If that were true, police officers would be going to prison for these killings instead of getting paid vacations.
But you can, on a back flip you're spotting the landing the whole time. 
Hahaha you are a fucking moron. True "alphas" don't waste their time acting like tough guys on the internet
Preferably make that one pushing be TLV because they count as 3 pushing.
Thanks for your help! I'm really looking forward to being able to clear the Dark Espers. *Dat L Sword Mastery*.... My Luneth is currently sitting at 613 attack and that +30 ATK accessory and L Sword Mastery materia is looking damn fine right about now. So does the Genji Blade and Atk+30% materia from the Gilgy trial... Okay, pretty much *everything* from those trials is looking super attractive to me right now.
Thank you!
Currently I prefer the other way around only because I found We Found Love sounding a bit dated nowadays, but it is super close at least.
someone made a post about bandit`s real face and it is so identical to this guy
My Nmom never taught me to cook, or do laundry, but I did have to do the dinner dishes. I also would have to help clean if she saw me downstairs before 1:00p.m.....which is when she stopped cleaning to watch her soap operas. Because I could never do anything the right way, I spent my summers staying in bed until she stopped cleaning every day. She thought I was sleeping and bitched about me not getting up to help her.....but she never told me to get up. I was actually just laying in bed, reading, until her soaps came on.  Summers were miserable. 
Amazing!!!
Ummmmm wait.  Is insurance optional from where you are from?  Is this a thing?  I'm Canadian and it's required by law.  Get caught without it equals big fines and loss of license and points I think.  
All actions have consequences. Don't be a dick.
Yep. I also realized that 12m is not a new size. It's the diameter of the proposed ITS. Nine Raptor engines would require not 3 x the diameter, but roughly sqrt(3) x the diameter of the Falcon 9. Nothing to see here. Move along.
Most people don't understand the damage trump has done. Without the "liberal media" there is NO news, only right wing propaganda. They are building a totalitarian state right in front of you.
Its for a cop
Noo i dont use it lol i have two new beauty blenders!
I think the three most interesting places he could go are:  - Pelicans  - Bucks  - Spurs  He'd probably make any of those three a contender. 
This content brought to you from "Taiwan Pool"  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#off site feed "Taiwan Pool")
kind of reminds me of the train station from Spirited Away. nice job!!
Same here. I also had Syndergaard in my lineup. Bad day at the office. 
There's already a perfect thread you could've made this comment in.
Well, you see, owning semi-automatic weapons is a regional tradition that goes back almost 70 years! You take that away, and we would lose our entire identity as Americans. 
If you create a new account it seems to work again, try that ?
i mean, look at that amazing....   Argument.
Authoritarian leaders who are propped up by the West, a fact that you guys can't just ignore
Well, back to studying until the 2nd period.
It's like you don't have too if your name is in it.
Fuck Paul Hamilton
The whole series is inspired by "Journey to the West", which was inspired by Japanese mythology.
*Mackenzie comes, instead of carrying a hopper ball she has a [purple play ball](http://1.bp.blogspot.com/_jVxMLAMuKvA/S8vVe1wkusI/AAAAAAAAA5I/YAtlYRbYSEQ/s1600/Brooklyn%27s+12th+Birthday4-14-10+007.jpg)*
###SexSells Stats for /u/princesskelsxo * Verification: **Verified Seller** [learn more](/r/Sexsells/w/verification) * Account Age: **274** Days | Karma: **4041** * No. of Listings: **21** [view](/r/Sexsells/search?q=%28field+author+%27princesskelsxo%27%29&amp;syntax=cloudsearch&amp;sort=new&amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;feature=legacy_search) | No. of Reviews: **3** [view](/r/Sexsells/search?q=%28and+%28field+flair+%27review%27%29+%28field+title+%27%22princesskelsxo%22%27%29%29&amp;syntax=cloudsearch&amp;sort=new&amp;restrict_sr=on)  ---  [Wiki](/r/Sexsells/w/) | [FAQ](/r/Sexsells/w/faq) | [Bot Info](/r/Sexsells/w/bot) |  [Report a Bug](/message/compose/?to=irrational_function&amp;subject=SexStatsBot+Bug&amp;message=The+post+with+a+bug+is%3A+https%3A%2F%2Fredd.it%2F68im0r) |  [Modmail](/message/compose/?to=%2Fr%2FSexsells)  --- ^(Version 0.6.3. Generated at: 00:00:13 UTC 2017-05-01)
Try playing standing. Turn with your body. This will all but eliminate the motion sickness.
well this does not require any access to user data does it?  but yes that works. it's different to queuing up together, but it let's you play with friends across platforms
Probably.
A Star Wars game where I can finally play as an Ewok Sith master. 
Thanks for the input.   My wife's different when it comes to me. When I'm wearing shorts and if I sit carelessly and there are guests in the house especially a female, she'd secretly let me know that I'm sitting inappropriate.   Sucks when only she can have all the fun of being watched haha
Oh we need to get all four of you together now ;)
KTD? :D
This may not be much help as far as suggestions go, but you may want to [check to see if a name is available](http://www.dcuolive.com/Character/Search).   It's worth noting that some names may not be available because they contain words that are not, or are no longer, allowed in name so they won't show up as taken in the database.   For example, if you do a search for "Iron Blade" it will show as "No data available in table" (at least on US/PC) but that's because the word "Iron" can no longer be used in a name as a separate word (maybe to protect the copyright of the Metal Man named "Iron", but it's kind of silly to not allow it as a separate word in other names).  Ironically, there *is* an "Iron Man" (still on the starter ship) and at least 1,000 characters with "Ironman" in them.  
We gotta start somewhere right? We have yet to see a Phoenix lord 
See here's the thing about that.  North Korea is not communist Russia. You are simplifying things way too much.
I'm really jealous tbh
You could just get your shirt hemmed by a tailor.  Those are boots, workboot-style boots. Common recommendations are Golden Fox, Chippewa, Thorogood, Red Wing.
Well i assume the set is going to be very popular so lots of pulls to try and get it
3k + TW Troikas for Crimson Spiralis?
I was raised bilingual and now I study languages for funzees. I do this. This is a really cute name for it.
Glad I wasn't the only one who noticed that. Holy fuck, who conceived the dialogue on this bit?
To be fair; from teh examples shown in the article, she hasn't made the style "her own' so much as straight up ripped it off.  Morriseau's work was unique and dramatic, hers seems derivative and boring. Frankly, I'm surprised the gallery wanted to hang it in the first place.  Unless this is a gallery that makes its money selling to tourists who want something that looks "Canadian" and that derivation is exactly what they were looking for.  In which case, perhaps the outrage is justified?
That mission is fucking cancer with bots. I don't know why you would want to do that.
I enjoyed Iltutmish of Delhi. Eastward expansion through holy wars, westward expansion through marriage claims, ridiculous amounts of tax revenue and raiding opportunities.
So basically the poster is being messaged by his friend. Except it's not really his friend it is that friends girlfriend using his phone and pretending to be him, she is trying to catch her bf cheating. 
Im sad so i smoke. 
i made it
Never heard of him till now. Looks like he looks the part. Was thinking of pre wwe ambrose or old cactus jack. Your pick looks better for a sentai team. Maybe Crazy Steve would be an option?
O
Yes, I had assumed it was a kids show because his previous show was for kids. I was wrong, but regardless, I don't find it interesting enough to watch again. It's not important to me. 
Yeah I'm feelin pretty good rn. 🏒
Yeah. That was some sinister shit. I was screaming at that kid standing outside the door to DO SOMETHING. That really stuck with me.
I don't think they will, still can't blame anyone for being scared of it though
Appreciate the share, OP. I gotta say it, however: that song is not in Jerry's Wheelhouse. And he sounds WAY out of it. Those type of arrangements(the band is Terrific) should be left to Ray Charles et. al. IMO....
Add Dean_Naka on psn for some hardcore fun times. Grouping up and voice chat is definitely the way to go.
Let me spell it out for you.  If I have income and can pay for a place to live, I can also pay for another place to live.  That's just a matter of paying a different person for an equivalent service.  It doesn't (necessarily) cost more than paying for where I am living now. If there is a fire that destroys all my belongings, there is nothing to move, so it would just be a matter of finding a new apartment.  Yes, I would be out of all of that stuff, and that would suck, and I would have to buy some new stuff, eventually.  However, what is valuable about my stuff isn't its monetary value.  I have a lot of things that are essentially unique because I made them or they are tied to specific events in my life and are consequently irreplaceable.  Renter's insurance cannot replace it.  Can it get me a new computer, yes.  Can it replace all the data on that computer, no.  Can it replace all my drawings and artworks and obscure books and collected items, no.  I don't even know what the monetary value for them is, and it may very well be zero.  According to my roommate, renter's insurance here is about $25/month.  I might could afford that this month, but I don't have a long term job, and I can't really afford to pay random fees that will never have an ROI.  I definitely could not when we moved here, and I never know outside of a particular contract what I can afford.  Also I've lived in dozens of places which have not burned down, and none that have, so you're not going to make a lot of traction with me to pay a fee I can't afford, to cover an extremely unlikely circumstance, in which it won't do anything for me anyway.  You seem to lack reading comprehension.
From Ivy, out middle, through our connector. Like a speed demon.
https://reddit.zendesk.com/hc/en-us/articles/205192985?mobile_site=true  This apparently. 
I would've made the subtitle "wanna get nuts c'mon let's get nuts"
I would only consider a traditional IRA if you don't have an employer-sponsored retirement plan, because then there's no income limit on deduction.  But at the same time, I'd argue that you'd be better off looking for a better employer that offers a retirement plan, or going self-employed so you can use other options like SEP-IRA, Solo 401k, etc.  If you go SEP-IRA, beware that there are [limitations](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/SEP-IRA#Self-employed) based on your net profit.  Which means you probably won't be able to put in $50k.
dominus GT and dominus gt distortion for regular septums
I don't know which is more unbelievable - that you are surprised that people don't use teamwork in a shooter that doesn't have callouts, squads, or star cards that synergize, or that you used the term noob unironically. 
Yesssssssssss
Your topic should not be ME oriented but something to discuss with all of RAOA I like [Suggestions] I feel like it's open ended enough that it could apply to a lot of things such as books, movies, TV shows or suggestions on where to find something. 
Anyone leasing or know anyone else who's leasing out a place to stay for 1 person?
She's taking care of her eggs just fine
When leo gets to fuck Margot Robbie 
&gt; you can get a pretty good idea of what things will look like 5, 10, 20, etc. years from now...   Pretty good idea != knowledge. You claimed you knew, because you have seen the data. You don't know shit, you have mainstream science's best guess. That's not knowing.   &gt;...if nothing changes.  Things changing is about the only thing that's guaranteed. 
Shit, well then I guess I'm not leaving. Thanks for the response!
UPDATED   **Ship List and Equipment**: [Ships](http://imgur.com/NguPETK) | [Equipment](http://imgur.com/a/8NOo8)  **Current Resources:** 80k/81.5k/193k/61.5k + 437 buckets  **Difficulty Goal:**  Hard but depending on difficulty of event may do hard/med mix  **Preparation Plans:**   * Kai Ni Suzuya or Kai Chikumi depending on event requirements  * Level Teste (69) to 70  * Level Kumano (74) to 75  * Level Ooshio (77) to 80  * Level Hatsuharu (69) and Tama (60) in PVP for the event  **Playtime Available:** Tues-Fri expeditions every 3 hours during daytime and playing 7pm-12pm, Sat/Sun/Mon on and off all day  **Misc:** Improve Type 21 skilled planes to +6 (1 done, 1 at +2, 1 at +0)and Iwai flight to +10 as currently +9. Wont start event until maybe 5th May, can probably stockpile 12-16k more fuel and ammo to hit 90k+ and maybe 5k more bauxite. Should be able to stockpile another 70 buckets to hit 500  Any suggestions on ships to emergency level are welcome
would you rather have lobsters on your piano or crabs on your organ?
Don't forget the compulsive need to be intoxicated every waking hour while abroad because 'Hey, the beer's sooo cheap!'.
Sorry 
But you can only aim in 8 directions!
Durran opened the door with a smile seeing The Lord Commander of The City Watch. "Ah, hello my lord how do you do today?"
Agreed!
LMAO what the fuck is this, a portrait of the first person to play in the NBA's European Development League? Seriously, who the fuck is this guy and how did he """"make Europe""""? Hilarious.
Expensive, but it very well may be worth it!
The food choices are rough haha.  I eat a lot of chicken and bacon on the diet. Fat head pizza is a staple for me on keto as well.  Have you ever looked at intermittent fasting? I usually stop eating at 8 and then eat at 12 the next day. I workout at 11 after drinking usually 50 ounces of water to curb my hunger pains. 
So you're just going to quit your job with no notice and be unemployed living at your mom's house for an unknown period of time? I can't see this ending well.
&gt; It's a thing that cuts beans up into smaller bits, there's not much to it.  Sorry, but this isn't true at all.
He's been straight up terrible all year.
lololololol
I remember things people think I don't Remember. If I truly care about what you said or were just chill together I won't forget anything 
We have the best moms don't we folks?  Jebs mom: I never said you were my favorite Jeb: *gives dying from within type of smile*
How did you see them spark if you were the one eating them? 
I want to die
That's only a few hours away from me jeez
On paper this team shouldn't be as bad offensively as they are. And this isn't necessarily recent, they've always been sort of lacking in firepower, just before the defense and bullpen were so finely tuned that they could get away with it. Now they can't.  So I also feel like Meulens might share a fairly large part of the blame, but I dunno how far the FO is willing to go to shake things up.
Came out as bi. I live in a smallish town where all the gay guys my age I know are taken.
old.No and day.My   Joke aside I don't see any team picking him up unless they don't care about relationship with other teams.  
Since you asked for a website/app and were given them but decided to do it the weird way.   Additionally Google Sheets over Excel??? WTF!!!
Probably Nola, but the report he had more soreness after a side session is troubling.  Kershaw missed a great deal of time last year with a herniated disc. If it turns out that is what Nola is dealing with, it will be the same case with him as well. He's far less valuable if he's going to miss time.
Why? You want another round of incremental improvements?
Steam controller support. (just plug the dongle into the USB ports on the dock, maybe?)  Can you imagine zelda with those twin trackpads?
point rank currently is TSM with 42, Hammers with 33, C9 with 32, Gankstars with 22, Tempo storm with 7, Immortals with 6, and both Rogue and Tribe with 4. This still could change as the third place match and the finals have yet to be finished. If C9 wins the finals they will move into second place behind TSM and secure the second bye for the live finals.   If you are referring to who is thought to be the best in the region, then the answer is still TSM is thought to be the best. Hammers and C9 are thought to be the next best teams in the region. Hammers are also the only team that TSM seems to have trouble against. If you are asking who is thought to be best in the world the answer is Armada from South Korea. Edit: The final point total after the finals is TSM 44 points, C9 34 points, Hammers 33 points, Gankstars with 22, Tempo storm with 10, Immortals with 6, and both Rogue and Tribe with 4.
I have the Aspire Cletio with the RTA deck and the flavour is amazing. I was using a Melo 3 that came with the Pico Mega and the Cletio is hands down way better. 
&gt; Misleading headline?  What did you expect its the telegraph :)  Here he is in video form: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HeOvJ-PwKG8
securing up votes for oneself by posting about how much you love the NHS and hate tories.
From your link:   &gt; Eligible customers who purchase a qualifying device or perform a JUMP! upgrade using our Equipment Installment Plan (EIP) in T-Mobile retail stores or at My T-Mobile.com will automatically receive up to $240 via a **one-time bill credit.**  Get phone on EIP. Wait for **one-time bill credit** to apply. Pay off remaining balance on phone(or just keep paying through regular EIP). Theres nothing in the promo that says its a monthly bill credit over 24 months, its all a **one-time bill credit.**
Except I'm not. Unfortunately that means nothing on this reddit though.
i got my imp one trying to get kril kc
I think the point is for them to look a little dirty. 
Any real app, not a mere example? Thanks. 
dont worry, if we learned anything from when he was here, he'll fizzle into irrelevance when it matters the most.
Requires downloading and editing an Excel file. 9 minutes including fiddling with download/upload. Thanks.
Bigfoot has been coming to my bedroom every night for the past 3 months. *giggidy*
I think that makes him a cockblock and not a madlad. Madlad would have snuck the song back in without this geezer knowing. 
Music is a little stranger things-y.
Look into games like r/eu4 or r/civ , or games like r/battlefield_one . Less cancer.
Sucked off a guy that had an enormous dick. I mean, coke can thick, and at least 8 inches long. I didn't know I moaned when sucking dick until that one. I thoroughly enjoyed it. But I need to train my booty to take dick. I'm way too tight. Any recommendations? I have a silicone/coconut oil hybrid thing. But the dildos I use absorb it too quickly. I'm kinda lost. Maybe a butt plug could help? 
idk I keep winning if u keep replying so
Thank you, I really appreciate the sympathy.
Holy moly, only one person? That's so incredibly specific that it might be something...  Or not, but hey, sleuthing is fun.
Do you have a court-appointed defense lawyer currently?
mp4 hurt me?
This is what I would LOVE the WWE to do. Have wrestlers hit their opponent when their least expecting it, instead of waiting until they turn around to hit their move. 
&gt;10-32 shooting statline  Yeah, and the King of the Prairie does that daily now and no one gives him shit for it. 
marathon
Mutherload McFaggot
Both run in the rear
My wishlist  * Tim coming back and becoming Batmam (Time for Timbats)  * Gorilla Grodd and Black Adam joining RHATO  * Lex getting a solo book written by Geoff Johns  * A Trinity and RHATO crossover (Trinity vs Dark Trinity)  * A new Swamp Thing book  * A new Shazam book  * MM to join the Justice League of America  * A Young Justice team led by Tim with Cassie and Connor if he dosent become Batman(He better become Batman.)  * A new Secret Six written by Gail Simone. Except with Captain Boomerang on the team.  * For Kyle to go back to being Space Jesus  * For New Super-Man to go on forever.  * For Justice League of China(Lead by Kenan)  * Booster Gold and Blue Beetle mini  * For Guy to go back to being a Red and lead a solo book.  * For a new Detective Comics team lead by Batwoman with Spoiler, Clayface and Duke Thomas  *  A new Outsiders team with Black Lightning, Metamorpho and Katana, lead by Batman  * For the JLA book to find out what it wants to be (and im enjoying this book, plots just a little everywhere.)  last but not least  * For Roy to ditch the trucker cap.
I think its clear renee is just a newcastle fan wearing the team colours celbrating promotion.
Patched. 
Fk LBJ and FDR
How do I get unbanned ?   I asked about the identity of a caller :(
&gt;  Any age-based system ignores the fact that many people are not ready to handle adulthood simply because they've been around the Sun enough times, just as it ignores the fact that many people are ready to handle adulthood sooner than some number on a page dictates.   While that may be true, age is the best proxy for that we have without having to resort to needlessly extensive tests.  You may have the occasional 14 year old who is mature enough to handle a 30 year old guy (like Danaerys Tagaryen), but as a rule this doesn't apply and you're better off restricting these freedoms for younger people as well without having to account for special premature snowflakes.
I don't care how it gets done, as long as it gets done
That's what I assumed as well.
Cambozola!  It's a triple-cream cheese with blue veins in it. Much milder than most blues (I've gotten friends who don't like blue cheeses to try it and some have liked it a lot), and incredibly rich and creamy, especially if it's been out of the refrigerator for just a little while. Think Camembert or Brie, but with just a little bite to it. The rind is edible. I was once at a restaurant in Carmel that had slices of Cambozola on little toasts with a Kalamata olive on top, all lightly warmed in the oven till it became all melty. Ohhh, that was heavenly!
No advantages. I'm on sierra and wish I'd stayed with Mavericks
Nah, preshow streams on youtube and facebook 
Dead and Buried is great but the amount of time it takes to find someone to play it with really sucked the last time I played it. I prefer the horde mode in it any ways so I have turned towards the Quest in Rec Room.
Voluntourism
If the default is just when obtaining a driver's license one way or the other sure.  cus then you're still seeing "organ donor" , sure that's i'm cool with
It's like rain on your graduation day
When Jenny dies in Forrest Gump
Except trading in Rust is now more common and viable than it has ever been before, thanks to the vending machines...
The infinite portion scales exponentially, I believe, not by 100 packs per level.  At the very least it scales by a ridiculous amount.  It could be that normally the tiered (non-infinite) upgrades normally go up by 25 research packs, but with your 4.0 multiplier you see an increase of 100?  You should double check the costs in a world with 1.0 multiplier.  I can't load up the game right now to check, myself.
Oh fair enough, most of the time when I see this on Reddit it's people complaining about cost of living but refusing to move because of it which only furthers the problem. 
It's possible and something you should consider if you are storing a life-changing amount, but it is not so likely.  Any hardware can be backdoored to steal Bitcoin private keys, including computers or hardware wallets.  In my opinion, I think that it's more likely a Bitcoin hardware wallet would have a backdoor that is targetted to steal Bitcoins than a common PC would.  I also think the real risk is a targetted backdoor, where a backdoor is put into some hardware that has been ordered by someone known to have a lot of Bitcoin. A backdoor put into every device would likely be found by someone.  The best advice I would give would be to go into a store and pick up a laptop box off-the-shelf randomly and buy it. That way you can be fairly certain that there isn't a targetted backdoor in your machine. Every one of those laptops would have to be backdoored, increasing the risk of someone else finding the backdoor.  Use that machine as an offline wallet for electrum/armory. Additionally you can use it to read/write important documents, and store important PGP keys etc.  One risk with an offline wallet is how you transfer data back and forth. Electrum lets you do this using webcams and QR codes, but IMO it's a bit too inconvenient and also cannot be used to transfer files (which you SHOULD NOT do without A LOT of care).  If you use a USB stick, a file you transfer can get infected and used to spread the infection, but a second risk is that the firmware on the USB stick gets reflashed by a virus. This kind of attack is very rare, but it is known the NSA has the capability to do these kinds of attacks. There is a cool device that can protect you from this:  https://hackaday.com/tag/usb-condom/  If you do plan to use a USB stick, have it be a dedicated stick that you only use on your online and offline PC, and get the smallest size you can (1GB is plenty).
They literally played a whole group stage just to determine the seedings for the playoffs. Secret, the number 1 team in groups, was knocked out in the first round of the playoffs by the 16th placed from the group stage. So after winning three straights Bo3s, they got instantly knocked out by the team who lost their first 3 Bo3. Sounds really idiotic to me, to be honest. 30 full Bo3s to just *seed* 16 teams is really strange.
This content brought to you from "Taiwan Pool"  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#off site feed "Taiwan Pool")
Mr Satan is the pinnacle of human potential without ki in the DB-verse. Everything else comes from Ki.
M; Methinks this may be the wrong account
Nothing, Flappy Bird was enough we don't need more of that. 
What's the context?
Thats pretty much the reason they used the name, though.
Minneapolis/St. Paul syndrome. While driving you pass on the right because there is morons everywhere driving slow in the passing lane.
[m] FYROM would be in NATO IRL if it wasn't for Greece. They'll veto the EU too. Try and solve the dispute and your golden. Either way your pretty much protected by the west 
I don't know about flying from Canada, but airport security in the  US is picky about liquids, even factory sealed stuff.  I've had new, unopened jars of condiments confiscated.  Might be worth doing a little research first.
I think the bass is a little too distorted but I do really like the distorted vibe, just maybe bring it back a notch. This has a pretty dope groove. That break at 1:32 is hot. Agree with the other comments about the "yeah ho" sample, feel pretty meh about that but other than that really feeling the elements.  Mine https://www.reddit.com/r/makinghiphop/comments/68dmuu/official_daily_feedback_thread_april_30_2017/dgyh7ce/
Okay thanks a lot I'll try that tomorrow 😀
kk!
Hot dogs!
youths.gif
YES! x3
What's going on with that cat ears?
I sincerely hope you let me know when your book is published, I'd love to read it!
I'm working on one.  Twitter: @mlfarrell3d
3:  Sloane   2:  Jacobs   1:  Walker 
I probably will with my next twig.
worst idea ive ever heard. Or high quality shitpost idk  ¯\\\_(ツ)_/¯  Just in case it's serious i should add a point i just had experience with. I played a 2 v 2 game against these 2 players that had matching names and emblems. My teamate was a randy and was also quite salty so he ended up rage quitting.  It was super fun.  I stuck around practicing revenge/outnumbered strats and it was really fun. I didn't win until after about 4-6 games when i pulled out meta girl (PK Kappa).   I know many streamers force dishonorable matches since it's a good way to keep learning mechanics and getting better. I would hate to discourage people from experiencing that. 
Bill Clinton here...
The ban has since expired, he's allowed back in now 
Same thing for me the past couple nights. We used to have no problem with just quickmatch finding us a server. Last night we finally had to use the browse server feature with conquest being the only one checked off. We kept hitting refresh until there was a game with two open spots. Hope this helps. 
For a second I thought that he was making a really good point, then I realized he's just retarded.
Congrats.  Now the real game begins.
I imagine people want to see this not happen again. Maybe implement a policy that your channel will specifically say (and/or prominently display something in the video when said video is paid content; that would probably make a lot of people feel better. 
You've been through so much and are in such an emotionally draining situation that it's totally understandable that things are a little off right now.  Not the same thing but crazy busy time at work and over the last 3 weeks there were 5 days where I forgot to eat.  At all.  I wasn't doing it on purpose, nor was I hungry and just couldn't make time...my body just forgot it needs food.  Stress and chaos can mess you up.  Hope you guys find some peace in working toward resolution soon.  (full disclosure, one of those days I ate half a graham cracker - it didn't help) 
That was a little exagerated. Usually I just drop it under the running water. I fill the sink when I am washing dishes, the stove top stuff, or any other random things (light covers today) around the house. Besides that sink and tub have an issue where the plug falls into the drain and I usually don't notice right away so even taking a shower the tub fills up a bit.
E
&gt; You already have the "answer", you just try fitting everything into it  That's exactly what you're doing.  You just can't see it.  You've determined, from whatever authority or textbook you're parroting, that God doesn't exist.  No amount of evidence will convince you.  I could spend hours giving you evidence, and you'd just dismiss it as a lie and claim I have no evidence, even though it's right in front of you.  It's like willful blindness.  It's foolish to keep giving someone like you evidence, because you're denying God's existence from the outset.  Your prejudice precludes correct interpretation or conclusion.  The Bible calls people like this "fools" because you're literally denying the ground you're standing on.  You claim, "I'm using logic" and then use those laws to deny the creator of logic itself.
No
Me too thanks :(
Volunteer squads have a lot of problems: there's a lack of mentorship in volunteer squads, usually volunteer squads operate in districts that are low-call volume, and people that participate in volunteer squads only do it a few times a week. I think that you will change once this becomes your full-time gig during residency, and you have more stuff to do. You will adapt. 
I would suggest not inviting Dr. Neil deGrasse Tyson to dinner. He may fact-check your star clusters and find out they're random.
Just show him [this.](https://my.mixtape.moe/roodhp.mp4) 
Don't listen to these haters. you do what you want man. who knows you could be onto something. the next meta deck.
amazon/ ebay... etc.
honestly a white person would be the last person to say either of these people are trash
Proto-Ghaazhgeen:  **\*ʃinol** 'pattern'
Nothing in particular. Just wanted to know how people felt of his style since he's not usually brought up when people are thinking about announcers.
It'd be cool if you could come up with some sort of cogent thought or fact-based statistic to support your argument instead of vapid, lazy, personal attacks. 
everybody fudges their attendance
As someone else said, Swellnet is used a lot down there in Australia.  I lived in Tassie 4 months last year and used it heavily.
Buick Regal Grand National.
Thanks for sharing your story.  The 20-30 day marks seems to be brutal, I'm heading into it right now and same vibes man my cock is going crazy telling me to release.  I will suffer, I will grown, I will carry on.
The games are the same, just longer and more likely to lose when someone leaves your team
Simply for fun. Wild has all the cards you've ever loved.  This mode isn't about a 2 year relationship only to be told it's over. You love reno? You can play forever.  Sylvanas? Yup, can still use her. Pilot shredder, boom, rag...whatever. They are still available.  And don't ever think of divorcing me from my N'Zoth. ;) So in the end, I only play hearthstone every day because I still enjoy it. And I play wild because I can still play whatever card I want.  Plus standard is basically the same 5 decks over and over. Wild actually has a lot of variety making it more exciting/fresh.
I'd think you would need to play a little more to see how long it takes to actually get to Bloodlust 3 which is what makes most pallets unsafe, and how Bloodlust 1 and 2 make some unsafe and some still safe. It needs tweaks yeah, like Billy being able to use his chainsaw to break pallets and still retain bloodlust. But I think that'd need a little more than 3 hours on both survivor and killer to see how much it really needs to be changed.
Die Hard/The Force Awakens
I think you know Perez well enough,  if there is one president capable of doing that,  it's Flo. 
I literally just turned 17 this month
Ending of Furious 7. 
I'm not following...
Why make a native iOS app when you could embed a webview in an app? User experience. 
What's going on here? 
Redhead beach NSW by any chance?
o my b thought the show was cross brand bc of orton and Ko 
So where is the wood YOU worked on?
No, Bojangles all the way
Abraham Lincoln
Shhhhh. Don't startle it. It's in its native habitat. The elusive Wal-Mart parking lot piss bottle. 
So when are you going to quote the book. Its 136 pages, a pamphlet basically
He got turned into Flood soup, right
OP deserves to be fired for posting this shit.
I have that same team too. I have their respective weapon except for my ninja Asuna 
BRONCOS_29
To address each point:  1. Wits has INCREDIBLY strong late game scaling due to its synergy with Rageblade and Teemo E, which I explained above.  2. Bork is terrible paired with wits, correct. But you dont build Bork on Teemo if you actually know what youre doing outside of specific lane matchups/ team comps. Same with the bloodrazor top fad.  3. Youd still build Tabi/Mallet with on-hit, thats part of the core. 4. Runnans isnt needed, On-Hit Teemo plays to control a quarter of the map by slaughtering anyone that face checks into his shrooms and threatening a Sorc Elixir gambit if the enemy team ignores you. Wave clear is fast enough already with Rageblade and Wits.  5. Visage is crap on on-hit Teemo. He doesnt need CDR, he gets more 10 more MR from wits, and he doesnt need the extra sustain  When you say "Late Game Scaling" I get the feeling you're uncomfortable with how cheap the item is and feel as though low cost=bad item late game. Look at the item as I explained in the context to Teemo and youll find its worth far more than you think. Going by the gold efficiency per stat explained on the wiki: http://leagueoflegends.wikia.com/wiki/Gold_efficiency  133.33 AP = 2899.9275g 25 MPen = 933.25 40% AS =1000 65 MR = 1170 Total = 6003.18g  Which is why I said Wits is such a retardedly strong item on Teemo. 
I know what you're saying. Though my first impression was to instinctively assume she was floating in zero gravity and thus marvel at the artist's attention to that detail in the breast shape. Not that I necessarily agree they'd look like that, just that they seemed to try to incorporate that aspect.  My second impression was to realise that my own biases had influenced my first impression. The moon conjured space for me and I'm listening to ringworld atm, so my impression is probably off base and just influenced by those things.
Include those first two sentences in your profile.  No bathroom mirror selfies. Period. No shirtless selfies. Anything with a gun, fish or other dead animal goes left. Don't have anything that comes across as trying to advertise wealth. Your car, your boat, etc. I personally am not a fan of pictures that show you hang gliding or mountain climbing or sky diving or standing in front of (insert famous landmark here). I don't really care for a thousand emojis either. And for the love of God don't use the word "sapiosexual."
If you don't have kids then there's no reason to have anything to do with her or pay attention to,or even know what's going on in her life.  Even if you do have kids,you can set a firm line that you will only talk to her about them and shut down any and all conversation about anything else. If you don't have kids with her,I'd even consider moving to another city as far away as possible. 
It's not your fault, he is purposely staying pretty much silent because he wants to keep alluding to the idea that Andy got him banned
For me it's not about the pace but his dribbling feels really clunky. He's fast enough with a chem style anyway.
I actually really like this! I love the color variation!
PERFECT?   *mole six inches right of navel*  *kidneys in the wrong spot*  *only two nipples*  more like am 8.4/10
Hey there, /u/TheSperm!  Thanks for your submission, but your post has been removed. For frequently-asked or common technical questions, you have several options:   * Check our wiki for [frequently asked questions](https://www.reddit.com/r/NintendoSwitch/wiki/faq) or look over our [tech support guide](https://www.reddit.com/r/NintendoSwitch/wiki/techsupport).  * See what people are saying, or if your question has already been answered, in our ongoing [Technical Support MegaThread](https://www.reddit.com/r/NintendoSwitch/comments/5x3zkr/megathread_technical_issues/).  * Use our [subreddit search](https://www.reddit.com/r/NintendoSwitch/search) to check if your question is already being discussed in another thread.  If you feel that none of these solutions fits your question and your post has been removed, please let us know or resubmit your post, making sure it has enough discussion text and technical detail to uniquely stand alone. ---  If you have questions or objections about this removal, please [reach out to us in modmail](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FNintendoSwitch) **and include a link to the removed post**.
Nashville syndrome, your job in the waiting industry/hair salon is just temporary, but holy hell you are going to make it after your free show at exit/in or rockettown. Btw you are as unique as everyone else doing exactly what you are doing... The rarities in nashville don't play an instrument and just want to make a living...its a weird diminsion...
https://www.harley-davidson.com/shop/motorcycle-gps
http://imgur.com/2sJqGe4  Talked to my dad today and he recommended the same thing so we ran to the store and got some small blocks we added to the bottom. Thanks for the advice!
[Autowin](http://i.imgur.com/Pg9yNmz.jpg)
Childhood!!
All good! :)
Warriors in 4  Spurs in 7 _  Celtics in 6  Cavs in 5
Adults argue. That's how conflict works. 
Thanks for taking the time to comment! To address your first question, I think a "family" man is someone who is dependable for the most part. I kind of talked about it in my post, but one of the hurdles in our relationship is the age difference. Being 20, there is definitely a lot of growing I have left to do. She herself has some too, considering that she is planning on going back to school at some point. I think that at to be able to take our relationship to the next level, I'm gonna have to step up and work on some personal issues I feel I have, the ones I listed in the post. The fact that I withdrew from school has been a source of anguish for myself in the past, so I think it has caused me to be weary of going back only to drop out and waste money. But, I do realize that education is the best path for success. What kind of work do you do, if you don't mind  me asking?
hmm the only thing I remember about this particular boss back in JP is that **if** possible, you can try to kill one or two of the archaeodemons as their damage adds up the longer the fight drags on. add in Belias's hp and this is one of the longer fights even with shout.   the only strategy I can think of is rush belias while trying to kill off one or two of the archaeodemons(without synergy..this'll probably be very difficult) as their Ultimate Gigaflare and Dark holy hit pretty hard.  accessories with petrify and silence resist will deff aid in preventing your party form being wiped(not really, **especially** with the adds U gigaflare spam and lifebreak to make things harder, plus Belias's powerful magic attacks as well)  as long as you have wall, a dancer and perhaps 2-3 healers with ultra cure this shouldn't be too bad(though belias's petrification and confusion attacks are a bit problematic)
Huh, I wonder if it is no more. It was in st Matthews, near trinity. Was a staple of childhood shopping trips with my mother.
Are you serious? There's another city in Canada named Vancouver. It's normally in the top 5 cities in the world...  https://www.theweathernetwork.com/news/articles/three-of-top-5-livable-cities-in-the-world-are-canadian/71309  http://www.cnbc.com/2017/03/14/these-are-the-worlds-15-most-livable-cities.html?slide=16  http://www.gq.com.au/lifestyle/travel/sydney+world+rank+mercer+quality+of+life+survey+2017,49913
You spelled saints wrong
1000
Em 1988 criaram a CSLL que nada mais é que um adicional de 9% do IR que só as empresas pagam.  Depois criaram o PIS (que antes era o fim social) e também o Cofins.  Depois o PIS/Cofins Importação,  que apesar da semelhança no nome não tem nada a ver com o Pis/Cofins e é só mais um imposto aduaneiro.  Em seguida aumentaram a alíquota do Pis e da Cofins tornando ambos não-cumulativos.   A essa altura já foram criadas várias contribuições que só são pagas somente pelas empresas. Eu nem falei das CIDES (contribuições sobre intervenção no domínio economico) que devem ser mais umas 8 contribuições diferentes.   As empresas já fizeram sua parte sim, essa coisa de criar mais e mais contribuições toda vez que a previdência não consegue pagar as contas é uma loucura. Vai arruinar nossa já pouca competitividade.  Nesse momento ou se aumentava a contribuição Precidenciaria dos funcionários  (como tentou fazer o RJ) ou se aumenta o tempo de contribuição, não existe uma terceira saída.  Conforme os juros forem sendo cortados isso vai fulminar a rentabilidade dos fundos de previdencia. Se o Brasil quiser deixar de ser "um país de rentistas" ele vai ter que ter uma reforma na previdência.
I second that. It's creepy as fuck, and makes me wanna not watch R&amp;M.
Maybe it lived with the people in the apartment before OP moved in?
someone named "BetterDaysSeen" bamboozled me out of "American Sniper" (of all movies) ... said he wanted that one and another code and then deleted their reddit account after i sent (i checked the account before sending and they had some history with that username) ... (i'm not gonna pull a credit check for an American Sniper trade) :) but  still lame)
I don't struggle much with AA kiting and A clicking - There's a rhythm to it. It's the spell weaving I'm bad with. If there was a high APM champ that relied on mostly autos, I could handle that - but anywhere with quick spells rotations or a combo of clicking and buttons QWE rotations I struggle with.
I'm so hyped! I hope Reigns can somehow overcome the odds!
Who is doing 300 fps on 60hz panel in anything but csgo?  Who is buying a 1080ti with a 1080p 60hz panel anyway?
Or a mute girl, then they can't say anything
I hate sand 
New WWE slogan  *If anybody can do it, it's Roman Reigns*  "So guys what do you think of Big Show vs Baron Corbin?"  "If anybody can do it, it's Roman Reigns"
Schaub was horrendous for us when he had to start. Lacked pretty much anything. Mallett was head and shoulders better than him and I don't rate him half as much as fellow Ravens fans. Hell even watching Clausen was better than Schaub.   EDIT: Pretty much our whole team was injured too, but man was Schaub painful.   Although he did apparently do a great job alongside Clausen of preparing Mallett for the Steelers game.  
That or bacon grease that's been collected and cooled so that you're just getting the fat. 
I did not have this issue at all. Right from the start they worked flawlessly. Sería por la distancia que estás de tu teléfono? Como todo si te vas muy lejos salta o se para pero si no trabajo perfectamente desde la primera ves que los use. 
Yes
Sounds like you get to minimize time spent in traffic.
That would be great if you could, thanks a lot :)
Loooool! The burn was amazing!
Sorta gonna have a hard time with that, with stuff like Emiya whose arguably a bigger spoiler for those who never seen UBW.  Edit: It also doesn't help that she screams Excalibur in the tutorial fight at the very start of the game. You'd have to be reaching to not connect the dots.
More like the motorcyclist paid for his retarded actions.  Another moron scrubbed off 
Jones is a super sub. Give me him for 20 to 30 minutes at the end of the game. 
00110   01010   01100   10010   10100   11000   00111   01011   01101   10011   10101   11001  
Not in Texas. Pussies. 
You should Cap off the corner of that radiator pipe.. They get hot. 
I have set the link flair to: **No Longer Needed**!  ---  For information about using the bot, see [Practical Bot Examples](https://www.reddit.com/r/Random_Acts_Of_Pizza/wiki/howto_bot) and [Command Reference](https://www.reddit.com/r/Random_Acts_Of_Pizza/wiki/bot_reference)
let em free. Wear your sneakers.
Here's the thing: if poor treatment by members of the movement causes white allies to reject the cause, they're not allies at all.   If these white "allies" were truly concerned with fighting racism and creating a safer world for people of color, then some "ugh I hate white people" wouldn't stop them.   Also, the name shouldn't alienate white people either. It's a black movement. If the only way you can reconcile standing up for a black movement is by changing the movement to no longer be a black movement, you are a shitty ally.   Moreover, a lot of your stats are really shitty. Yes, more white people are arrested and all, but black people are more targeted *IN PROPORTION TO POPULATION*. 
Vienna Syndrome: basically it's just being one of those old people always saying "back in my days everything was better and we had culture and everything!" While at the same time trying to be cool and young again.
I can't believe the only thing that outrages you is the writing of the article.  &gt; So..... yeah...... how is this article news and not BS spin?  Trump has asked to look at going around it.  That is not spin, **komrade.**
I understand those things but your post title doesn't make sense at all. Who taught you how to write?
Wow! You already win.
Yeah, over here (in the Netherlands, but Belgium is probably the same) you're always expected to do research. You're almost always expected to teach a few hours a week as well. They hire you like a normal job (it's pretty competitive) and they pay you, too.   (You *can* get a PhD 'on your own' but that doesn't really happen in practice, at least as far as I've heard.) 
Animorphs books  The Pirates of Dark Water cartoon  Super Mario Bros. 3   Born in '85
Me and my ex went and saw UP on our second date. 10 mins in amd shes ugly crying and a snot bubble came out of her nose. It was adorable.
Wow that was a nice theory. Enjoyed reading it.   As for whether rope burns appear on Jessica's neck, some people speculate that collecting just all the recordings are enough to trigger the "no-burns" ending. 
Absolutely.
Well as you can see, we are resurrecting our fallen soldiers. Medics won't help but we appreciate the gesture.
what level you looking for
WOW. I worked as a manager for a while (not worth it), and I can honestly say I would have throat punched her. Fuck. I can't imagine hearing someone say that to my workers would have set me completely off. I am SO, SO sorry she said that horrible shit to you, and I'm shocked at your DH. That's not cool, regardless of whatever thought got fucked up in her head.  Congratulations on your darling child. Hopefully he never gets to know how his dad's mom feels about him.
Between us we can admit we would fuck most decently attractive female acquaintances given the chance.
Yes, credit card should be fine, although I suppose they may be trying to save OP the processing fee.  
This app is signed how normal Cydia apps are; it won't work in non-JB mode, but is designed  to ensure that you won't have to re-certify your jailbreak app when that occurs.
a deck that plays a 1UG can have equal access to white mana as one that plays WUG
Can you explain the KBD75 Assembly service options? What does YES/NO and Backspace/Lshift/NO mean?
Yep. I talked through internet with many native speakers. Most of the time I couldn't understand slang or my eyes hurt from their mistakes.
the club were setting up for their finisher, cass booted anderson, and enzo rolled up gallows for the pin.
Side view of cock and balls with dotted line issuing from the head. Maybe it's pee. Maybe not.
If i was him and i had any sort of weapon she would have been forced out of the house within 30 seconds of that shit starting. People like yhis don't deserve any sympathy 
I think it depends on who you are and what kind of relationship you're after. There are always pros and cons, there's a lot of 'truth' and 'right' going around, it's up to everyone to figure out what's true and right for them.  An older, more established man is a good choice if you're into a more traditional dynamic and you're somewhat traditional yourself. Looking after a father figure is not inherently wrong, when it offers you stability.  OTOH, if you're looking for a 'partner in crime' type of relationship, then, usually, a smaller age gap is better. Besides, if you'd like to have children, but not in the next, say, couple of years, it might be easier with a younger guy, first and foremost from a practical point of view. Biologically as well. I know there's a lot of bro science going around TRP about this, and yeah, *technically* a man can have children even in his, say, 80s, but the reality is just as female fertility and chance of healthy conception decreases, so does a male's.  Also, similar experiences build up similar characters/tastes/traits. Let's say I grew up in a good economic climate and my partner who is some years older experienced political and economical instability growing up. Those experiences alone bring up very different individuals, I would tend to be more careless with money in the sense that I'd spend it on culturally enhancing experiences while he would be much more down to earth, trying to secure a home, a stable career, etc. You can see how something simple as this can bring a lot of strain in a relationship with a big age gap. It's up to you to decide who you are and what kind of people you mesh with better.
It's yours whenever you're online. Whisper me to pick it up!
At least he's a shill who still has a decent podcast unlike Rosenberg.
 &gt;complaining about something you didn't even watch  wew lad
damn, shes pretty!!
Lordsaladface have another
omg!! yes. this is SO me!!!! especially on strength days, i'm like ok well i'll just tryyyyy and then end up running the whole time!!!
Yep. And I think everyone saying "hey testing was meant to finish in March, it must be bad news because we still haven't heard anything" needs to take a chill pill. It's probably just taking KZ a while to finalize her petition. Hardly anything in life ever runs to schedule. This is a big case involving a lot of people and a lot of evidence!
I know and it's true not just for Apple, what upsets me is people always target people who buy Apple products and over generalizing saying things like "people only buy Macbooks for the Apple logo" like he did above. The way he put it doesn't make sense because he assumes Apple users buy them for brand name and ignore performance and features, going as far as saying it's throwing away money for no benefit(completely dismissing that Apple products are actually good) as if it was an universal fact. 
fuckin sweet, man.
Well, damn, this'll be a birthday trip for the ages. Also in Toronto and already planing to make the trip down for this, too. 
BECAUSE THE CLIPS ARE MENTALLY WEAK FLOPPERS! 
Armored truck is the way to go now.  I assume you know how to get to the bikes...once you get there, take a right out of the parking lot, then take your first left and after a very short driv e there'll be a vacant armored truck sitting on the middle of the road.  Whoever has the money sits in the back.  Enjoy :)  EDIT:  You need to trigger the alarm at the bank and get the swat team called in for this to work as well
I like the name.   I can't attest to the previous ones, but yes, Witcher 3 is a masterpiece.
Wait, you can get HBO for just a couple months? You don't have to sign a contract for a year? We switched from HBO to Starz and now I'm beyond regretful... I just want it for a few months to watch Game of Thrones.
I say 0.73%
## Sorry. Your post has been removed from /r/BoomBeach for the following reasons:  ### No recruitment posts unless you're an [official Reddit Task Force](/r/BoomBeach/wiki/taskforces).  Learn how to [get your Task Force verified as official here](/r/BoomBeach/wiki/taskforceapplication).  Please post to [/r/BoomBeachRecruit](/r/boombeachrecruit) instead.  ---  ####If you have any questions or concerns, or if you feel this determination is in error, please [message the moderators](https://www\.reddit\.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FBoomBeach&amp;subject=about my removed submission&amp;message=I'm writing to you about the following submission: https://www.reddit.com/r/BoomBeach/comments/68hfct/pigeon_squad_recruiting_players_of_all_levels_we/. %0D%0DMy issue is...).  #####Direct replies to official mod comments will be removed.  ####Continued posting against the rules will result in being banned from the community.
so many things! Yes I loved going in the Playplace at Mcdonalds too.   Born in 89, I turn 28 in a month.  -1990s Nickelodeon/Nick Jr. especially on summer vacation being stuck at my aunt's or grandma's all day with my cousins haha.   -Blockbuster Video   -1990s Chrysler/Plymouth minivans. My parents had a maroon 1993 Plymouth Grand Voyager and it was the van of my childhood.   honorable mention: the old-style Local Forecast on the Weather Channel. I LOVED it as a child. 
 My Girl ALWAYS gets me. "He can't see without his glasses!"
Wow. Thats incredible. 
I will admit it had a slow start. By Act 3 though is where it really started getting good
I understand where you're coming from, but remember that the more criteria you impose, the more people you systematically exclude.
I did the same, and after a few tries and some orbs spent I managed to get all 4 units from the golden week banner with decent Iv's, now I'm sitting at 50 orbs with all of hard and lunatic + paralogues to go and also all future orbs via quests and dailies. Not sure if I should save for the upcoming banner with linde, Julia and Sanaki or Celica or simply save until the summer banner hmm....
rushden in the building
I'm not the original poster, but I'm also about to be in CS (and math) at Pitt. You got any tips on how to do well in pitt CS or how to find these opportunities? or anything else to add? This whole post and some other similar sentiment I've been hearing around has made me kind of worry about it. 
I'm just sad that both of those posts you linked [knocked my post down from the highest rated post of all time on that sub](https://www.reddit.com/r/thriftstorehauls/comments/55oda3/_/) down to #3.
To aid mobile users, I'll link small subreddits not yet linked in the comments  /r/HistoricalWorldPowers: Historical World Powers  --- ^I ^am ^a ^bot ^| [^Mail ^BotOwner](http://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=DarkMio&amp;subject=SmallSubBot%20Report) ^| ^To ^aid ^mobile ^users, ^I'll ^link ^small ^subreddits ^not ^yet ^linked ^in ^the ^comments ^| ^[Code](https://github.com/DarkMio/Massdrop-Reddit-Bot) ^| [^Ban](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=SmallSubBot&amp;subject=SmallSubBot%20Report&amp;message=ban%20/r/Subreddit) ^- [^Help](https://www.reddit.com/r/MassdropBot/wiki/index#wiki_banning_a_bot)
-_-
The best guide I've read
Or play a real board game /pretension 
Try http://apsubjects.weebly.com/ap-macroeconomics.html and/or https://apmacromicro.wordpress.com/ and the Welker Economics (Jason Welker) YouTube channel has some great videos on specific issues as well. 
Live slow.  Die whenever.
Understood, but still brings up some weird imagery! guess you have to be a specific time of person/fan to enjoy it
Sinbad of the Seven Seas, starring Lou Ferrigno.  It's so bad it's amazing.  Watch it in a group.
my guess is he has to come up with precautions to not leak things and stop going to very public places that would be disturbed by calls
Why do I feel like we're about to see an amazing ppv?
Where did you get that shirt the one on the left is wearing? I need it for my tiny chilly chi!
Honestly I think the key to success is learning it well the first time around. I always tried to understand concepts before reinforcing them with anki to keep it fresh. I kept up with most of my cards until dedicated and then dropped the subjects I was stronger on. Other then that, I just did Uworld and Sketchy during dedicated and it worked out well for me. Also did practice NBMEs and tried to learn why I got questions wrong, which was often due to overthinking. That helped me make the last push. Hope that helps! 
Adding on, what happens in the case of divorce or separation? Say a woman has three children with a partner already and they separate. If the man remarried a new woman with no children, is he allowed to have 3 more with her? What about the first woman?  Can she have 3 more children with a new man, or is he only allowed her original 3?
Reboot. Run it again. 
I've been a lifelong MTB'r and 300+ rider. Lost 35lbs over the last 6 months. Currently at 301.   Stay away from off the shelf performance wheel sets, or be prepared to re-lace them with larger gauge spokes. You will break spokes made for normal riders.   Never buy top of the line equipment. It sacrifices durability for weight. Stick with upper mid level equipment.  Carry chain repair equipment. I've broke more chains then ever had flat tires.   If a tire is really low weight and has thin sidewalls. Don't buy it.  I've ruined some nice rear rims after the sidewall rips out in a corner.   Good luck out there. 
ya the steel orchids project was money from the ont gov specifically for culture. City couldn't use that money for infrastructure even if they wanted to.
So I'm guessing you're probably 50 years of age and older and never grew up with computers let alone the internet. I would find a legitimate source and quit believing everything you read on the Internet. Also what your saying has nothing to do with economy. Your just saying through science, technology, medicine etc, that people live better lives. That doesn't have anything to do with economy 
For me, stage one is kinda determining we both like each other and have an interest in romance. Once that happens somehow, then I usually just am VERY direct. I'll just flat out say "Now that it's clear we both like each other, we should discuss our expectations for dating, sex, etc" and then I'll go on to say that I like to take things very slowly and I expect exclusiveness if we're gonna be seeing each other in a romantic way. I just lay it all out there, lol.
Like the vacuum from Brave little Toaster
/r/InitialDvideos/
PS4
Kinda low.
You think very highly of Logan
poloniex
I'm sure she's happy doing whatever she's doing now, otherwise she would have come back. At least that's what I like to think.
I'm furnishing my first apartment here and I bought my mattress from Dreamer's Outlet or Mattress by Appointment or whatever you call it. According to them, my queen mattress and box spring I purchased for a little under $500 retails over $1,200. Everything in original bag, new, and under warranty. They have upscale stuff too like adjustable base beds and tempurpedic. Not sure what the rest of the city thinks of them but they have generally astounding reviews on their page. 
Nothing but bootstraps.
Yeah sadly the list goes on. San Diego gave up a lot to move up to take Leaf and it didn't pay off. Going into that Draft, however, my 12-year-old self thought Leaf was going to be a good quarterback.
i would let those heavy guitars breath a little more. not sure how they are eq'd now but maybe a boost somewhere in the 2k-4k range possibly a cut to the mid range depending on what sound you are going for. doubling the guitar track will give it a lot more body too. not cloning but actually recording a second guitar track
This is what I have too, going on 4 years with it and it's great.
Homeward Bound, that scene, he was too old it was too far
Thanks!
I think you mean masochists
I see the cause, I'll be considering but give me time to think :)
Like 4/20
for this instance yes, because it is not fabricated and are wondering what you are looking at, and wondering why you can tell. It is a legal document indicating an audit from the IRS, if fabricated then it would result in crime for fabricating the document with the IRS. If you want to play this game then do it. Show me the proof. You cant.   Even MSM that hates trump agrees he is audited. Why? because he is. You can't just say "it looks fabricated" every time you dont like something. You can't just say "show me the proof" every time you dont get an argument right. Most of all, you shouldn't call people you disagree with 12 year olds. Especially if you dont know how to argue, or just in case you get your ass exposed as someone who has no idea what the fuck they are talking about. Now you are wasting my time.  http://www.cnn.com/2016/03/30/politics/donald-trump-tax-audit-letter/
For some reason, in Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind, I start bawling every time it gets to little kid Joel running around. 
Just watched it for the first time. I really enjoyed it. My take on the ending - [I felt it was sorta closure on their story instead of leaving it open. I felt it was showing that all this could've happened if a few things went differently and they would've been happy. But then they BOTH couldn't have achieved their dreams (it didn't seem like Sebastian got his club in that flashback ending?) Also, I loved how in that final scene before the flashback when it zoomed on Emma Stone the candles in the club created a line between her and her husband to isolate her for the flashback](#spoiler)
I know. I high key stalk all of their social media
fuck you.   My counterpoint: censoring one's self out of fear of seeming immature.  If you want to swear, swear. If you don't, don't. Looking down on whichever side you aren't part of is just dumb.
Beethoven: I am Ludwig van Beethoven, world famous composer and pianist.  Yakko: You're a what?  Beethoven: A pianist!  Yakko: Mwah, goodnight, everybody!  Beethoven: But that is what I am! A pianist!  Yakko: I think we heard enough out of you!
I don't know, do you want to get back? And remember that she would be a completely different person that you remember. Sometimes we hold on to images of the past remembering people but maybe you won't like this new person.  Stay open to the possibilities.
Either the Perfect Day scene in Trainspotting or when Isabelle hears her brother playing their song to another girl in The Dreamers. It really hits me.
I think that the companies that make them either change names or just spawn from each other. Migbot and a few others have/had bad customer service and go out of business quickly due to issues with that and production. I originally ordered another 260 dollar printer and the company making them went out of business. By the time i got my refund from the order Migbot had popped up with the same advertised deal so I bought it. Same printer and everything.
I think it would be simple to come up with a sentence like that, but I could of course be wrong.
You don't wanna jinx him THAT much. 6 months of domination within the start of the CPT doesn't do shit when your end goal is to win that real big money tournament in Late November/Early December. 
fuck
I've never had any issues with advertising on my servers, I must be lucky.
Is the echo 1 full metal
"Well you can always come back to my place."   *Ethan proclaims, not realising how that could be taken to mean.*
I know. I just mean in general. 
Arizona, I think. Maybe the Browns. 
Probably Alabama
Source Post: [reddit.com/68igbq](https://reddit.com/68igbq)
Not questioning anything. Just answering gingerkid. 
Added
Never.  It only serves as a mediocre version of the 10cm+AAFD.  The only situation where it becomes useful is in achieving OASW and retaining double attack but that only applies to Asashio K2D, not counting post-marriage ASW.  Even then, a T4 Sonar works when she's max level all on its own.
If I'm standing 20 feet away from a mortar and the lifting charge fails like that, you can bet your ass I'm hitting the deck and covering my head. Wouldn't expect someone like this to know that though. 
I've found the best deals for soil on Kijiji.  I once asked for 10 yards (less than a tandem).  I got an awesome price and the guy dumped like 20 yards in my driveway.  Turns out I needed about 20 yards. Call 5 - 10 phone numbers on kijiji. If find you often need more than you think.  The best deals are going to be if you get a tandem dump truck load.  
A
As far as I know there are no mountains in its way. But it wouldn't be able to go past features that stop it but if there is an opening it could creep around and surround it.
It's funny because fulloffantasies's username is very applicable to their comment. ^^*beep* ^^*bop* ^^if ^^you ^^hate ^^me, ^^reply ^^with ^^"stop". ^^If ^^you ^^just ^^got ^^smart, ^^reply ^^with ^^"start".
I live in manhattan and your username is homage to Hitler 
Exactly. I own a small company of 22 employees. For the past two years, I've been adding exercise equipment to a part of our warehouse by purchasing it from Boeing's auction site. I put in a shower. Employees happy, working out, feeling good, and I join 'em. Clearly reduces sick days. At this point I'd be dumb not doing it.
Weirdly very true. I've had multiple college professors compare story structure to the male orgasm. Always surprised by how accurate it is lol
Thanks man.
That's why it's so sad, it was more of a "look at me! I tried and I was a war hawk so I'm justified". 
lmao "Could it have worked any better?"  Yeah Scott they could have scored two goals on the play
I believe it's broadcast on YouTube as well.
&gt; Seems to me it's more "majority" privilege. If you are a minority in any country you're going to experience some form of racism.   Not really, a good example of your rule being broken is apartheid South Africa, far more black people than white but white privilege mattered quite a bit.  It's worth mentioning that whiteness being viewed as positive isn't just a facet of western culture anymore, and while I certainly don't have the international or racial knowledge to say exactly how this works, whiteness can still get you advantages in a county with a majority people of color. (one good example is that in countless places across the globe being white comes with the implication that someone has more money, thus improving their service.)   &gt; This idea of "white privilege" makes it seem like this only happens in white majority countries.   Why do you think so? I think it implies that it has an implicit connection with being white, and doesn't really seem to have anything to do with the majority of a country. 
I've looked up a ton of different grey and red fox calls, and it doesn't sound like any of them. We aren't in a coyote area either, so I thought it could be a bird, but I don't know!
this is some solid advice, thanks.
Good but still not meat... Hmmm
Sure it's a shame that he was attacked after the game. And if any racial abuse did happen, there is no excuse for despicable behavior like that.  But we still have no proof of said racist abuse. If it happened, I wish the AFTV guys would post proof so we could try and identify/punish the culprits. Instead, they're passing around the same video clip that is a "Who let the yids out" chant, not monkey noises.
Your hair gives me Steve vibes from Stranger Things. Nice fit 
That chase scene on the highway still holds up 
&gt;My uncle raped me.
Depends where you are...  Our local resident roos are very road smart...  The missus was telling me that the other day when she went to work the ones that tend to sit next to our drive didn't bat an eyelid when she got in the car and drove out...  They also stay on the gardens and rarely cross the road...
AJ is a time traveling wizard
They were on point tonight. 
That's 2016 batting champ DJ and 2017 Snek triggerer 
Well 30% of people thought that bombing the brown kid was right but the bombing was bound up in an agreement involving foreign direct investment in a 3rd nation and a movement to increase the maximum allotted inclement weather days for k-8 public schools.
http://eytanzana.deviantart.com/
Kim Kardashian has hit rock bottom!
But at least you can do it from Mom's basement in rent-cheap South Dakota.   No need to move to LA, wait tables, and cram yourself into a dingy studio apartment with twenty other aspiring writers.
Z2
&gt;What? America never "belonged" to england. The better analogy would be natives should get their land back from americans...  Jews are the natives.
No his head caved completely in and he ~~dead~~ ded, him opening the door was just a reflex action.
&gt; that being chronically ill is a choice as well and we're just not trying hard enough to get better because we like leeching off the system through disability  I get told this constantly, *even though I'm not on disability.*
Ceddit missed it
Except reddit is not arenanet's forum?
Love star wars but quit half way though season one. It was a formula of:  Obi Wan: Anakin, we need to attack grievous at this position. Do plan A, plan B is too risky  Anakin: HELLLLLLL YEA PLAN B BABY!  Ashoka: We're the best sky guy!   *hundreds of dead droids and space Australians later*  Obi-Wan: Anakin, you expressly disobeyed orders but it all worked out and grievous is on the run. Good job  *Everyone chuckles as the credits roll, R2 beeps in approval*  Is it possible to just start watching season 3 without seeing season 2? 
183 Tiana Kreygasm C3-G1 Global LUL
Sure. At 27 I started a new career teaching. I'm 34, and about to open a new business. The best time to plant a tree is 20 years ago. But the second best time is right now.
It's a lot better than the dual coil M2. The M2s got to where they would spit back for me. Not having that problem with X4 although it is a new coil.
GG Allin's real name was originally Jesus Christ Allin.   ...  Good luck in life kiddo.
Divorce, debt, and a cultural disregard for older men as human beings?
I need that silver left back card 😍😍😍😍
Don't forget to fill in your address in your profile.
**[Original Submission by /u/methmouthjuggalo](https://www.reddit.com/r/Wicca/comments/68hckg/did_a_small_maypole_with_close_friends_for_beltane/)** into /r/Wicca  ---  # Subreddit Overview * A community for: **7 years** * # of subscribers: **16,051** * # of mods: **6** * Subscribers per mod: **2,675**  # Popular Posts Summary * Top domains: self.Wicca **(74%)**, i.redd.it **(6%)**, imgur.com **(6%)** * % NSFW: **0%** * Average Score: **15**  # Discussion Summary * Average Comment Length: **~57** words per comment * Flesch-Kincaid Reading Level: **5** * Comments per post: **~9**  # A sampling of top posts: * Top all time: [Pagan Federation Ireland doesn't hold back. (195 points by /u/the_coffeeguru)](https://www.reddit.com/r/Wicca/comments/67qzgc/pagan_federation_ireland_doesnt_hold_back/) * Top this month: [Happy spring! (158 points by /u/WeAreEvolving)](https://www.reddit.com/r/Wicca/comments/67jcsq/happy_spring/) * Top this week: [My first altar ever! Happy Beltane! (137 points by /u/malpow13)](https://www.reddit.com/r/Wicca/comments/68c6v7/my_first_altar_ever_happy_beltane/)  ## **[Subscribe at /r/Wicca](/r/Wicca)**   
Sounds like you flirt the same way the American girls flirt with Colin in Love Actually.
Install the Uber app and link it to your credit card.  She'll never have to worry about the cost of a taxi, which I find seems to be an impediment to most people.
Awwww I am blushing 
oh god, they already think im a loon at the corner burger joint.  ill have to go in and order  the pelican burger. i usually tell them i want the road kill special....(northern mn)
Citation needed. Journalistic ethics is typically associated with maintaining commitment to truth, maintaining independence and encouraging transparency. I'm not aware of any ethical obligation news writers have to avoid having a viewpoint. 
why is it that they almost never played this song live?
Here's your paper weight!
 &gt;I know about the saying of two types of rifers, but I've always kind of hoped it can be cheated - it doesn't HAVE to happen. I love riding, but it might be that the risk I signed up for is larger than i initially thought.  I'm kinda superstitious about that saying so I always dump a dirt bike anytime I'm out in the sand dunes. If I haven't done anything crazy by the last day that causes me to fall, I'll just take it out to the baby dunes and dump it going a few miles an hour.  Seems to work. 
I dont want to agree with you but your 100 percent right. I love Faze as well there my favorite team but something needs to happen.
Actually it's the term kenem.
you mean closing and restarting the app?.. but the probability will be less right?
replied
Unless you want to be a band director, there's no point in going to TCU
P
What's that handle made of?
And his name was Naruto Uzamaki
Anti-censorship...of alt-right racist bullshit. They don't give a whit about censorship of liberal or even moderate views. 
You need to copyright it. Write it down and mail it to yourself - poor man's copyright.
Good. 
&gt;Labor ought to talk about nothing but their record versus that of the Coalition.  That would be unfair though.   Give me one example where the Coalition has mentioned Labor...  Job'sn Growth would have saved us all by now. If Labor and the Greens had done what democracy was created for, and just rubber stamped everything the Liberal Party wanted to do without any respect for the Labor and Greens voters who voted their Reps in to stop the Liberals pushing horrible policy.   We all know that Democracy means as soon as one party wins, the voters of all the other parties no longer have any say and just have to suck it up and do whatever they are told. 
LUL REAL
Hardys lose and become broken or do they continue a slow build to be broken?
